Medical Duty on a Blockhouse Line in the Eastern
Transvaal.
Lord Kitchener during the second phase of the
late war, in order to control districts, towns and
railways, constructed those little forts or block¬
houses, which eventually honeycombed the country.
Each blockhouse was a fort, well nigh impregnable
to rifle fire, but quite at the mercy of any big
gun or shell fire.
j
The Blockhouse lines were divided into districts!.
Each district was placed under a Commanding Officer,
who garrisoned the posts with his regiment. To
each district a medical officer was appointed in
order to preserve the health of the garrisoning
troops, attend the wounded in attacks on the Block-
'
houses, and maintain a watchful eye on the sanit¬
ation and water supply. I was posted to a remote
hamlet or "dorp" called Belfast away in the Eastern
Transvaal. My orders were to ride round the Block¬
houses of the Belfast command at least once a week,
see that the water supply was as good as could be
obtained, that latrines were properly constructed
and attended to, and to withdraw any soldierfi ser¬
iously ill, from his blockhouse to my detention
hospital/
hospital and then send him by hospital train to the
Stationary Hospital. At Belfast the headquarters
was situated. Both the hospital and fort were pro¬
tected by turf walls and loop-holed blockhouses.
On the highest point of the turf wall round the hosp¬
ital, the red cross flag was planted in order to
show the enemy during an attack, what wassneutral
ground. Attacks, however, generally took place at
night when no distinguishing espblem designated the
hospital. My hospital consisted of three large
marquees, two E.P.I.P tents (European Private Indian
Pattern type), and two bell tents. An abundance of
blankets, maPresses, bedsteads and the ordinary hosp¬
ital accessories were provided. An army operating
case, dozens of boxes of drugs of all kinds, anti¬
septic dressings, ligatures, etc., etc. were also
kept in stock. For rationing the patients there
were several boxes of tinned milk (ideal Brand),
Bovril, Valentine's Beef Extract, preserved chicken,
tongue, soup powders, arrowroot, etc, etc. and port
wine, brandy, and champagne were at hand for emer¬
gencies. My staff consisted of two hospital orderI
lies^, (one a clever St. John Ambulance volunteerj, ,
the other was a raw recruit, from the regiment),
a
cook^and a personal servant to look after my horse
and tent. We had a big stoYe fitted up in a
shelter/
I shelter made of corrugated iron, and an abundant
water supply from an iron tank at the railway siding
close bye All the water was passed through ouir
#
Berkefeld filter before xising. The latrines were
on the "dry earth" system and chloride of line and
Condy's fluid were lavishly employed to keep all
clean. We were quite close to the railway and twice
a week a hospital carriage stopped at the hospital
for two purposes. One was that I could put my sicki
on it for transfer to the Stationary Hospital at
Middelburgv«and the other was that I could board the
c-.: carriage and see if any of the sick already in it
required any medical attention. These sick came
from as far as Komati Poort and were on the way to
Base Hospitals. No doctor travelled by the train,
but two R.A.M.C. orderlies attended to the v/ants of
the invalids. If one of the sick were dying or in
a dangerous state he was taken out of the train and
carried into the Detention Hospital. This same
procedure took place all along the line where a
Detention Hospital was situated. When the Hospital
carriage (which was attached to an ordinary goods
train) left the siding. I wired to the next Deten¬
tion Hospital apprising the medical officer there
of the fact. The name Detention Hospital indicates
its purpose. Patients were detained there under
medical treatment till they could be safely trans¬
ferred/
5
ferred to a Stationary Hospital. Cases which were
of a mild medical or surgical nature were not trans¬
ferred, but were treated at the Detention Hospital
For instance, all cases of serious gunshot wounds,
serious accidents, enteric fever, dysentery or
pneumonia were transferred. . Mild bronchitis
diarrhoea, slight gunshot wound, etc., were treated
till they were cured and were then sent back to
duty.
The Blockhouse lines I had the medical charge
og extended for about 20 miles along a railway line.
Each blockhouse had a garrison of 6 or 8 men. The
houses were very warm and comfortable inside. The
ventilation was efficiently carried out by the loopT
holes pierced in the side. There were about 16 of
these loopholes in each house. The door was either
on a level with the floor, or close up to the roof.
.
! When situated on the floor level one got in and out
by half stooping or on Mall-fours". When hear the
'
roof one got in and out by going up steps of stones
or wood. Round the blockhouse was a deep trench
in which a sentry patrolled at night. At one part
of this trench an excavation was made to hold the
60 gallon corrugated iron tank in which the water was
I
stored. Each tank had a tap attached and a movable
wooden cover. A barbed wire fence and barbed wire
entanglements surrounded all, leaving a space of
about/
about 15 yards where the kitchen and water jars stood.
At a distance of 500 yards more or less, the latrine
was made. This was simply a hole in the ground.
Every week this hole was filled in with soil, and a
new one made. Each blockhouse had a box of chlor¬
ide of lime for disinfecting and permanganate of
potash for swilling out the tank at intervals. The
water for drinking was obtained from wells sunk near
small streams or sometimes from a clear stream near
by. As a rule a well of about 3 ft. deep was sunk
and a pile of stones laid on the bottom. The water
was then carried to the blockhouse tank where it was
stored. Before using it for drinking purposes, the
men were compelled, by medical orders, to boil the
water. A big kettle was specially reserved for
boiling the water. When boiled the water was put
into empty rum casks. Each blockhouse, all along
the line, was provided with four of these empty rum
casks and excellent receptacles for water they were.
Every week the tank had to be lifted out and clean¬
ed with Condy's fluid. The men as a rule when
thirsty drank cold tea or coffee. Very few of them
cared for the boiled water. The water obtained from
■
, . ■
I
the wells and streams was brackish and earthy.': Most
of the old soldiers were fully alive to the dangers
of enteric and. Bilharsia Haematobia from drinking
unboiled Transvaal water.
The/
The food supplied to the men was as a rule
wholesome and good.
The daily ration issued to each soldier was:-
1 lb. biscuits or 1-|- lbs. bread, or Inpound
flour, or T^ lbs. mealie meal.
Fresh meat - l£ lbs, or 2 ounces cheese,
or 1 quarter bacon.
Sugar, 3 oz. Jam, i lb.
Salt £ " Tea, i oz.
Coffee 1 " Compressed vegetables
1 oz. or £ lb. potatoes,
or £ lb. onions.
Small issue of Rum twice a week.
By judicious arrangement the six men at a Block¬
house got a varied dietary. Fresh meat and potatoes,
however, often were not obtainable. In many cases
where the blockhouse was near a ruined farmhouse,
fresh vegetable marrows and sometimes fruit could be
got from the old garden. Turnip, cari'ot, parsnip
seeds, young plants and seed potatoes were supplied
to blockhouses in certain districts on application
to the proper authorities. The men were allowed to|
cultivate the ground round the blockhouse if they
felt inclined so to do.
The health of the troops in the Houses, as a
rule, was excellent. They had all to do hard
physical work for three hours daily, Deep trenches
I
had to be cut along the line from one blockhouse to
another, and every man had to dig one cubic yard of
trench every six days. The wire entaftgl&ments and
! '
wire fences continually required strengthening and
repairing/
repairing, so that this work, while not excessive,
gave just the necessary amount ' of physical exercise
to keep the men in good condition. The average
soldier is proverbially idle and when not on duty
sleeps or smokes, so that I consider the digging
and wiring were very necessary correctives in an
otherwise monotonous and dreary life in a lonely
blockhouse.
Troops recently arrived in South Africa were
very prone to contract enteric fever, dysentery,
and diarrhoea. A volunteer section of Fusiliers
recently arrived in the country, were posted to this
line and almost all of them suffered at first from
diarrhoea. Several also developed enteric fever,
but these I consider contracted the disease on the
way up from Cape Town. The only cases of enteric
fever or dysentery I had on this line occurred
amongst these newly arrived troops. They were in¬
valided within ten days after their arrival, so I
do not blame the water supply or sanitation of ayblockhouses in this particular.
Veldt sores were the greatest scourge to the
troops on the blockhouses. Handling so much barbed
wire,they could hardly escape lacerating their hands
and arms. The laceration if neglected, developed
I
into a chronic indurated and septic sore. If the
laceration/
laceration were at once treated antiseptically it,
as a rule, healed rapidly. Many of the officers
lacerated their hands in this way and I provided them,
with tabloids of corrosive sublimate, directing them
to wash their hands several times a day for the first
day with this lotion and keep the part covered with
a piece of lint. This usually sufficed. On the
third day the hand would be well. The soldiers,
however? were careless about these cuts and very fre¬
quently only came for treatment when their hands were
in an extremely inflamed and septic condition. Most
of the sores were on the knuckles and the backs of
the hands. Every blockhouse on this line was pro
vided with some tabloids of corrosive, a pot of zinc
and mercury ointment, lint and a couple of gauze
bandages. These were given to the sergeant in charg
with directions for use. The frequency of the sores
soon became markedly less when this measure had been
carried out in all the honses on the line.
Another point of some medical interest in the
blockhouse life presented itself during the war.
}
\
That was the number of self-inflicted injuries.
A man would injure himself in order to be admitted
to hospital and so removed from the loneliness and
the undoubted monotony of a life in a blockhouse on
the high veldt. I saw three such cases in South
Africa. In one a bullet had been discharged, through
the/
/
the left foot,<kin another through the fleshy part
of the leg. In the third case the little finger of
the left hand had been blown off. Courts of En¬
quiry were held on these cases, and two of the men
were sent to England as "Prisoners".
The following case was that of a man, Private
Jones, 2nd Lancashix^e Fusiliers (Volunteers) who
had been five months in South Africa. All this time
he had been on duty in a blockhouse on this line.
He had never left the place and the monotony of the
life, as he said, "was getting on his nerves". On
riding round to this blockhouse on 20th May, 1902,
this man reported himself to me as unfit for duty.
He said he was "losing his memory", and the "slight¬
est work tired him out". He said he frequently
forgot the countersign at night. The sergeant in
charge told me that the previous night, this man
while on sentry had fired off his rifle three times
into the darkness, thinking he saw Boers creeping
up. Of course he may have seen these Boers, but
the sergeant and the other men said it was all imag¬
ination. 1 took the man into hospital for observation and gave him five grains of Calomel at once.
He was quite lively and active in Hospital. He told
me that he was tired of the life in a blockhouse and
got nervous at night. I told him that if he came
to/
to me with a similar tale again he would be brought
before his commanding officer. He was then sent
back to his blockhouse, and during the remaining
three months caused no further trouble. The man
I
of course may only have been malingering, but the
case appeared to me to be Hysteria.
The following cases will tyf>ify the class of
diseases one met with as Medical Officer on a Block¬
house line in the Transvaal.
RheumaticJToftsil-ii&i$n4 Pericarditis.
Pte. J. Beard. 2nd Lancashire Fusiliers.
Admitted to Detention Hospital on HOth April, 1902
with "sore throat". His tonsils were markedly
congested and the right one projected well towards
the middle line. Submaxillary gland enlarged arid
tender. Temperature 102°. Pulse 91. He was
put to bed and placed on milk diet. Given grs. v.
calomel at once and Sodii Salicylatis, grs.xv. six
| hourly. An alum gargle given for throat.
Next day, temperature 102.3° pulse 92. Throat
I
still very painful. The right tonsil was very
prominent. 1 therefore incised it under cocaine
with a curved bistoury and at once a quantity of
pus gushed out. This gave the patient almost in¬
stant relief. That evening temperature fell to
99°. He was much better next morning and wished
to/
'
to get up. He was sent "by Hospital train to
Middelburg Stationary Hospital this day. I was
much surprised to hear that he developed Peri¬
carditis a fortnight later in Middelburg, and died.
Diarrhoea.
Pte. Pullin, 2nd Lancashire Fusiliers ad¬
mitted 12 th , 1902 with a history of "diarr¬
hoea having come on the night previously". Went
to stool 7 times during the night. Had severe
colicy pains. Temperature 102°. Did not notice
any blood in the motions. Given at once Castor
Oil l|r ounces, and then Bismuth Subnitrate grs.
XX. every 4 hours. At night given Tinct. Opii
minims XX. Next day bowels moved once. Motion
formed. This diarrhoea never again occurred.
Discharged for duty on 15th 1902. The
Bismuth was given on the second day three times
and on the 3rd day night and morning. This case
of Diarrhoea is typical of a large number of such
cases. Most of the soldiers arriving in South
Africa, and young soldiers especially, develop
diarrhoea of a mild or severe description. Some¬
times the attack lasted a day, sometimes several
I
days. Sometimes, a chronic diarrhoea, with
intervals of comparative freedom developed. Various
I
theories/
theories have been advanced as to its causations.
Many attribute it to the cold nights, following
days of almost intolerable heat. Others attri¬
bute it to the water, the dietary, fruits, etc.
Certainly at sundown, one can at once appreciate
the sudden fall in the thermometer. The wise
man then puts on a heavy coat or a cholera belt.
He especially shows his wisdom in this particular
if he is a new arrival in the country. Pine
applies so common and so appetising in Natal, have
been accused of causing the diarrhoea which attacks
the newcomer in that Colony. In these cases of
diarrhoea the abdominal pain is generally very
severe. Often the patient is "doubled up" with
it, resembling a man in the throes of Renal Colic.
I generally prescribed for the condition, a
dose of Castor Oil to be taken at once and followed
by Subnitrate of Bismuth in large doses, or by
Salol for 2 days. This was generally effective.
Opium is often necessary to relieve -the intestinal
colic. Milk diet or "slops" only should be taken
for at least 24 hours. One of the favourite
remedies in Natal, is a strong dose of whisky con¬
taining thirty drops of Laudanum.
The only other cases of interest that occurred
on this line were two cases of paraplegia from
Lightning Stroke. I, however, lost my notes of
these cases.
The Medical Officer in Charge on a Blockhouse
line was responsible to the Principal Medical Offic-f
er (P.M.O.) of the district for his orders and
duties, and this official at intervals inspected
the various Detention Hospitals of his command.
Returns had to be weekly posted to the P.M.O. re¬
porting on the health of the troops, sanitation, or
any matter of medical concern. The following
copies of memos will well illustrate some of the
administrative procedures. As the Blockhouse sys¬
tem of warfare is comparatively novel, the documents
are of a certain historical medical value.
COPY:
Prom
Medical Officer in Charge,
Detention Hospital, Belfast, Tra%nsvaal,
To
P.M.O., Pretoria and L. of C.E.
Sir,
Attached is my list of cases admitted into
Hospital during the week. Forty men were admitted
from Colonel Park's column in the -
last drive in the
Dulstroom District. Of these, four were seriously
wounded. Six had developed Dysentery and two
Enteric Fever. Of the remainder, several were in¬
valided/
valided for Debility, Disordered action of the
Heart, Diarrhoea, Bronchitis, etc. Several of the
cases are undiagnosed - pyrexia being the only
symptom. Eight cases were sent from the column
as being unable to march owing to blistered feet.
The majority of the cases I have sent on by ambul¬
ance coach to the Stationary Hospital at Middelburg.
During the week, I visited the Blockhouses
round the village of Belfast and the Boer Concen¬
tration Camp, and the houses on the line from Nos.
255 to 264. In all of these houses, the latrines
were properly attended to, and the water tanks
regularly cleansed. In the majority of the houses,
the men drink cold tea in preference to boiled
water.
Veldt sores are still extremely common on the
line. This is due to the lacerations caused by
the barbed wire fencing and entanglements. I have
supplied ointment and dressings to all the houses
(as per my suggestion in last weekly report).
Diarrhoea is very prevalent with the volunteer
troops on the Dalmanutha blockhouses. These
troops have recently arrived in South Africa.
The Camp of 300 National Scouts still remains
here. These men, so far, have not required much
medical/
medical attendance. Several, however, are under
treatment for Scabies, two for Syphilisnand one
for Dyspepsia (Alcoholic).
During the week, I destroyed 144 tins of milk
and a box of biscuits - all unfit for consumption.
Circular 125 is being complied with.
I am, Sir,
Your obedient Servant,
(Sd.) A. A. MARTIN, M.B.,
Civil Surgeon,
M.O.i/c Troops
Belfast.
NO. 125.
M.0. /c. Belfast,
CIRCULAR MEMO No. 1.
As the Enteric and Dysentery season is now at
hand, will you please inquire into the Sanitary
arrangements of every Camp and blockhouse under
your charge. You should make yourself acquainted
with water supply and recommend boiling in every
case. I am aware that some blockhouses are sup¬
plied from one central water supply; other block¬
houses are depending on some local source. In the
first/
CIRCULAR:
-To
first instance, the water might he boiled before
distribution; in the second, the boiling should
be done by one of the men in the blockhouse; small
Kaffir pots or kettles ought to be supplied to the
blockhouses depending on a local supply, ana one of
the men in the blockhouse be told off to perform
this duty.
It is advisable to advise the troops to use
only boiled water and to po*nt out the danger of
using it where unboiled or unfiltered. The coming
hot season will very likely be an unhealthy one on
account of the number of unburied carcases all
over the country. I must therefore ask you to
make immediate recommendations to Commanding Offic¬
ers as to the steps they should take in order to
preserve the health of the men. I need hardly add
that all carcases near Camps or blockhouses, or
near water supply should be at once buried or burn¬
ed.
(Sd.) W. D. WILSON,
Pretoria,
28th Aug. 1901. Surgeon General, A.M.S.L
P.M.0., Army,
So. Africa.
j
Please bring this to the Notice of your 0.C.
Please forward report to me on water supfily of
every blockhouse at your station and section of
line./
line. State the source of supply in each case and
whether the water is boiled or filtered, or both,
whether a camp kettle for boiling is provided at
every blockhouse requiring one - what means of stor¬
ing the boiled or filtered water is provided.
In each weekly report state if this circular
125 is being complied with.
(Sd.) M. DORMAN,
Colonel, R.A.M.C.,
^ P.M.0., L. of C.E.
/fl&burg,
29th Aug. 1901.
CIRCULAR MEMO NO. 1.
Prom
P.M.O., Pretoria, and N. & E., L. of C.
To
M.O.'Vc, Troops, Belfast.
With reference to P.M.O. Army's Circular No.
125, it is not necessary to boil water drawn direct¬
ly from the town supply, or the water pumped to the
Ports from covered deep wells - when taken direct -
but all water from whatever source, when carried to
Block-houses in barrels or canvas bags, should be
boiled before being used for drinking purposes. The
bags/
bags should be placed in boiling water once a •
and all barrels cleaned out with a solution of
Permanganate of Potassium.
(Sd.) M. DOHMAN,
Colonel, R.A.M.C.,
P.M.O., Pretoria,
Pretoria, N. & E., L. of C.
8th Oct. 1901.
cL*~fo T*i-^*T~s» -^r*
($4/ <3 & //"
I
^•jeJe^k^y
(/^sCrot^-^"-o~~~u/ ■y^y-^JSu
•
&bstyf4c^sf. •
~t^rmrn—^*{p V> ^w«x^/
. ">//*
^ ^Z-^-lj
The Sulphur Treatment of Dysentery.
My attention was drawn by an article in the
Lancet (November 23rd, 1901) to the admirable
therapeutical value of sulphur in the treatment of
| dysentery. I had tried magnesia sulphate and for
-/ ?
j a time pirined my faith on its therapeutic orthodoxy.
It however failed in certain cases and in combination
with ipecacuanha it had also often failed. After
reading Dr Richmond's article I tried sulphur. 11
Altogether I tried its effects in 19 cases of dysen¬
tery. Of this number I have been able to keep notes
of only five or six, but these will illustrate the
nineteen. The sulphur in these cases rapidly ex¬
erts its action, it stops - almost after the first
dose - the tenesmus and colicy pains of which the
patients complain so grievously. Flatulence soon
disappears and a cure is established. Dr Richmond,
after using the sulphur on his dysentery cases at
the Imperial Yeomanry Hospital of Deelfontein and
Pretoria during the war, sums up his experiences
as follows: "in every case treated with sulphur a
cure has resulted and there seemed little or no tend¬
ency for relapses or chronic conditions of alterna¬
ting diarrhoea and constipation to occur."
In my limited number of cases, however, I had
i one which resisted the action of sulphur entirely.
An/

An interesting point presents itself in this connection. Is the liability to hepatic abscess less-
'
aned in cases of dysentery treated by sulphur, as
compared with those cases of dysentery treated by
magnesia and ipecacuanha?
Pte. Murphy, age 21. 2nd Royal Irish.
| Admitted to No 19 General Hospital, Pretoria, on
| 1st April, 1902, with a temperature of 102° and sev¬
ere diarrhoea, tenesmus, and griping abdominal pains.
While on sentry-go the previous night he had diarr¬
hoea. Stated that he was at the latrine "almost all
the night". At first had no pain. Towards morning
had pain in abdomen and constant desire to defaecate.
Passed little. What was passed was watery and blood
I stained.
This man on the next day was put on xx. grs.
! sulphur, six hourly, and morning and evening was
I given x gr. Dover Powder.
The griping pain and tenesmus disappeared after
the second dose of sulphur,, The motions from being
fluid, blood-stained and of foul odour, became light
J
iyellow and formed on the 3rd day of treatment.
| ..
I
I
Temperature continued normal till his discharge from
hoseital. The diarrhoea ceased on the 8th, He was
i
kept on milk and Benger's food till 13th, when a
little chicken-tea was given. Gradually went on to
normal diet.

Boiribadier Willey. R.Field Artillery, age 27.
Admitted on 27th March, 1902, with abdominal pain,
tenesmus, severe diarrhoea and passage of bloody
mucus. He had had the diarrhoea for two days pre¬
viously and was weak, haggard and exhausted when ad¬
mitted. Says that he fainted twice on the way up
to Hospital and feels "pins and needles" in his legs
On the second day of the diarrhoea he noticed blood
in the watery motions. His motions were of the
usual type, bloody and mucoid, with a scum or froth
on the surface.
He was put on milk diet alone and given no med¬
icine for 24 hours. Next day he was put on xx. grs
sulphur six hourly, and x grs. Dover's powders night
and morning. Next day the diarrhoea was less.
Still watery and particles of sulphur could be seen
suspended in it. Tenesmus and griping pains had
absolutely disappeared. He felt very much better.
On 3rd April the stools were yellow and formed.
On 12th April he was given chicken-tea and grad
ually ascended the usual dietary ladder to"full diet
The response to sulphur in this case was marked.
Private Wilson, age 28. Imperial Yeomanry.
This man was admitted wi'th a temperature of 101°P.
and a slight diarrhoea. Was then not complaining
of any pain or tenesmus. He was put on plain milk
and/
and soda water and was given no medicine. At this
time diagnosis was not made.
During the afternoon he had diarrhoea three
times and temperature rose to 102.@°. Sweated
profusely and complained of violent headache and
pain in the eyes. Abdomen slightly distended and
tympanitic. Lungs normal. One thought that it
was probably going to turn out to be Enteric Fever.
Next morning his temperature was normal and
before midday he had diarrhoea thirteen times and
during the rest of the day seven times. Liquid,
frothy, foul-smelling stools were passed. Abdom¬
inal pain became marked and tenesmus became extreme.
By 9 o'clock next morning he had diarrhoea nine
times and the stools were now frothy, mucoid, and
bloody. The case was obviously dysentery. He
was put on xx. grs. sulphur six hourly, and x.grs.
Dover's powder twice a day. Diarrhoea did not
cease, but the tenesmus and griping pain almost
disappeared after the third dose of sulphur.
Temperature kept up, however.
Next day he was given xx. grs. sulphur four
hourly and x. grs. Dover night and morning.
Next day given xv. grs sulphur two hourly and
x. grs. Dover three times during the day. This
was continued next day. The temperature now began
to/
to fall, and although diarrhoea was present there
was no blood present and the feculence had disappeared.
On 30th March he was put on xx. grs. sulphur
three times daily.
On 31st March the stools were yellow and showed
a tendency to be formed. No blood or mucus.
Benger's added to food. The future course was
uninterrupted. He made a good recovery.
This was one of the most obstinate of the cases
I have had under treatment with sulphur, but even in
this case the tenesmus, griping pains and blood rap¬
idly disappeared.
Pte. Laidlaw, age 21. Cameron Highlanders.
On 29th March, 1902 had diarrhoea during the day
five times and twice during night. On 30th March
1902 went to stool six times and had tenesmus and
flatulence. Noticed blood in the stools on this
day.
Admitted 31st March, 1902. He had diarrhoea
seven times during the day and night. The stools
were of the usual dysenteric type and contained
blood.
On 1st April he was put on xx. grs. sulphur
three times daily and x. grs. Dover night and morn¬
ing. Flatulence and tenesmus rapidly disappeared,
Blood was absent on the Srd day and the after course
was/

was uneventful. Given chicken "broth on the 14th
April. Previous to this he was on a diet of milk
and Benger's food. The temperature chart will
illustrate the case.
Drmr.Roper: 2nd Lincoln's. age 20. Dysentery.
Diarrhoea developed on 25th March, 1903. States that
,rhe was up allnight with it" . Pain in abdomen
!developed towards the morning of the 26th. Tenesmus
j
isevere.
He was put on sulphur xx. grs. three times daily
on the 27th and x. grs. Dover night and morning.
Stools bloody and slimy. Next day the dose was in¬
creased to xx. grs. sulphur six hourly. On the 29th
the blood had disappeared. The pain in abdomen and
tenesmus never troubled him after the second dose of
sulphur.
On the 31st the stools were loose'
and fellow.
On 12th April he was given chicken tea and then grad¬
ually went on to full diet.
During the convalescence of all these patients
they were given iron and arsenic or Easton's syrup.
They were all given thick woollen cholera belts to
|wear round their abdomen and back, and were cautioned
..
about drinking water from streams, etc., etc.
One disadvantage about using sulphur so plenteously is that the air of the wards becomes saturated
with sulphuretted hydrogen.

Chronic Dysentery:
Corpl. W. Bell, 2nd Dragoons. Admitted on
27th March, 1902, with diarrhoea and tenesmus. He
had been two years in South Africa and had had two
previous attacks of dysentery. For a fortnight pre¬
vious to admission he had irregularity of the bowels,
with sometimes the passage of blood and mucus. The
chart will show his state on admission.
The sulphur did not act in this case, and this
is the only case in which I have seen it fail. On
7th April I began to wash out the rectum daily with
a solution of silver.
A cocaine suppository was first inserted into
the rectum. Three to four pints of a solution of
silver nitrate (20 grs. to the pint) at a temperature
of 98° was injected every morning.
During the injection the patient was kept lying
on his back, with his hips elevated on two pillows.
This treatment eventually effected a cure.
Two Cases of Hepatic Abscess (multiple).
The following two cases are representative of
the course and termination of a vast number of ab¬
scesses of the Liver, met with in South Africa.
The patient has one, two, or three attacks of Dys¬
entery followed by an Hepatic abscess. If opera¬
ted upon in the very early stages, he will probably
recover. If operation is delayed, he dies. Hepa¬
tic abscesses following South African dysentery
are, as far as one can gather, generally multiple.
The Liver abscess met with in India is generally
single.
In the early stage of Hepatic abscess, one has
very little to form a diagnosis upon. The patient
looks ill, - he may have the "liver abscess look", -
he has had dysentery and his temperature ranges
between 101° and 99°. He may have no pain over
the liver, - he may not be jaundiced - his liver
may not even be enlarged. Yet as the liver abscess
is not an infrequent - sequela of dysentery in South
Africa, in any case of doubt, one should plunge an
aspirating needle into the liver and explore that
organ thoroughly. The exploration must be thorough,
because it is so easy to miss a small abscess xvith
the needle.
Case I./

Case I. Private K. Cameron, Cameron High¬
landers, aet. 35.
Was sent to No. 15 General Hospital from the Trans¬
vaal, "convalescent from Malaria and Dysentery".
His temperature remained persistently high, and he
had occasional rigors and sweatings. He was fully
dosed with Quinine on the assumption that the
temperature was Malarial. At this time he was
complaining of occasional pains over his liver and
"between his shoulders. He was very emaciated and
anaemic, took his nourishment badly and his pulse
was of small volume and very rapid. His liver dulness extended from the 4th space in the right
mammary line to 2 finger breadths below the costal
margin. Posteriorly, it reached up to the angle
of the scapula. He had moist mucous rales at his
right base, but no expectoration. Above all, he
had the "liver abscess facies", which requires to
be seen to be appreciated. It is a sort of muddygrey-yellow cadaverous expression. The facies
somewhat resembles that of a woman in the last
stage of cancer of the uterus. The patient was
transferred to the surgical wards under my care,
and with strict antiseptic precautions, a Potain's
aspirating needle was used to fully explore the
Liver. The needle was pushed freely about in all
directions/
directions and slowly withdrawn, but no pus could
be found. For the next 3 or 4 days he improved.
His temperature fell to 99° . He took his food
better, and stated that the pain had almost dis¬
appeared. These signs were deceptive however, for
on the 4th day after the exploration, pain again
returned; temperature crept up again to 103 and
his condition was very much worse. Eight days
after the exploration, he was accordingly put under
a general anaesthetic and a needle with a very
large calibre was again driven in various directions
through his liver. This time, an abscess cavity
was struck in the posterior part of the right lobe
just under the diaphragm. The needle was left in
as a guide and 2 inches of the 8th rib was resected
in the posterior ajcillary line. With a sharp knife,
the liver tissue intervening between the abscess
cavity and the chest wall was then divided and,a
plentiful flow of fetid pus resulted. Two large
rubber drainage tubes were then fixed into the
cavity and the patient was carried to bed in a very
collapsed state. He rallied well during the next
2 days, his pulse improved, and his temperature
fell. Then he gradually sank into a general toxaemic state and died 5 days after the operation.
Post/
: ' ■ '
• ■ - ■ ■ ■■

Post Mortem:- Liver found in a state of fatty
degeneration. A large abscess cavity found in
the upper lobe with irregular sloughy walls. (It
had drained freely through the tubes). The rest
of the liver was studded with hundreds of small
abscesses. One was about the size of a small
marble. The remainder were about the size of
wheat seeds. In the region of the caecum and
rectum, old dysenteric ulcers were found. The
other organs were negative, except for a slight
pleuritic effusion at the base of right lung.
Case II. Private S., 2nd Devons, aet. 30.
Had a severe attack of Dysentery while in Ladysmith during the siege three years ago. Had a
second attack about 2 years ago, while on "trek"
in the Transvaal. Had a third attack in January
1902 and was in a military hospital up north till
the middle of February. On admission into No. 15
General Hospital on 16th February 1902, he was
jaundiced, anaemic and emaciated. His diarrhoea
had ceased. He complained of pain over the Right
Hypochondrium, Epigastrium and over the Spleen.
His pulse was feeble and "rocky". Had a septic
temperature ranging between 102° at night and 99°
in the morning. He had the "liver abscess facies"
well/
well marked. The Liver dulness extended in the
Right Mammary Line from the fourth rib to a full
handsbreadth below the costal margin. The edge
was distinctly palpable. Posteriorly, the upper
border expended to the middle of the scapula. The
liver was painful on superficial and deep palpa¬
tion. Spleen was enlarged. Abdomen rigid and
protuberant. This pain over the liver came on in
the initial stage of his last attack of Dysentery,
and had been present for about 4 weeks previous to
his admission to this hospital.
On 17th February, the day after his admission,
he was put under a general anaesthetic and the live#
was needled in the usual way. Directly the needle
entered the middle of the right lobe, a rush of
blood took place into the aspirating bottle, and
this was immediately followed by pus. The needle
was left in in the usual way, as a guide, and the
8th rib was resected in the mid axillary line.
When the abscess was opened, about a pint and a
>
half of pus welled out. Two large drainage tubes
were inserted into the cavity and the patient was
then carried to bed.
18th February, 1902: Pulse 168. Volume and ten¬
sion poor. General condition very unpromising.
Heart's/
Heart's action weak and rapid. Given Tinct.
Digitalis MX. and Liq. Strychninae Mv every 4
hours. Stimulants by mouth. Nutrient enemata
and rectal salines.
19th February, 1902: Pulse 170. "Runs" at times.
Tubes draining well. Dressings require changing
twice daily. Is slightly better, but still
critical.
23rd February, 1902: Pulse 100. Volume better.
Patient's general condition improving. Tubes
still draining well.
24th February, 1902: Takes food better. Pus is
bile stained and more "mucoid" in its consistence.
Patient feels better.
26th February, 1902: During last night the dress¬
ings were soaked with blood. On removing the
dressings and the tube, and on inserting the finger
into the abscess cavity, a large blood clot was
> „
felt. I plugged the cavity with cyanide gauze
and gave Rectal Saline, etc., as the patient was
very weak.
27th February, 1902: No recurrence of the haem¬
orrhage, but patient is obviously sinking. Lies
in/
in a semi-comatose condition and rambles at inter¬
vals in his speech.
28th February, 1902: Died.
Post Mortem:- Liver markedly enlarged and fatty.
One large abscess cavity in right lobe with ragged
walls and containing a blood clot, which in places
was breaking down. This haemorrhage appeared to
have come from an Hepatic venous tributary which
lay in the midst of a mass of sloughing tissue at
one side of the abscess cavity. The remainder of
the liver tissue contained about 'six or seven small
abscesses, some situated near the surface and some
situated much deeper.
Spleen large, friable and deeply congested.
Intestines - the lower end of the small intestine
and coecum showed several large dysenteric ulcers -
some were healed and cicatrized, some partially so.
Healed ulcers present in rectum.
Appendix - healthy. Other organs negative.
Remarks:- In both of the above cases, the opera¬
tion was performed too late in the course of the
disease to do a lasting good. In both,the ab¬
scesses were multiple. Both were very bad sub¬
jects to operate upon as they were weak and debil¬
itated/
itated by the prolonged septic poisoning. Officers
of the R.A.M.C., who have had considerable experi¬
ence in Tropical diseases in India and South Africa,
agree that a liver abscess following on South
African dysentery is one of the gravest of sequelae
and is a condition in which, even under the most
favourable circumstances, the prognosis should be
very guarded.
——- Bilharzia Haematobia. —
The following three cases are illustrative of
the usual tyre of Endemic Haematuria which occurred
amongst our soldiers while on service in the Trans¬
vaal and Natal during the late war.
Pte* Parker 2nd Duke of Cornwall's Light
Infantry, aged 28. Went to Komati Port in the
Eastern Transvaal in August 1900 and remained there
for 9 months. He then "renorted sick" coranlaining
of "blood in his water, pains in the lower part of
the belly on making water and weakness." The first
'indication he had of trouble was that one morning he
"noticed his water to be very red." This "redness"
continued every day.
Three days later he says that he passed a long
thin clot of blood at the end of the act of micturi¬
tion. Clots were frequently passed after this.
The passage of these clots caused him at first marked
rain in the Hypogastrium. This pain became less
later on in the course of the disease. He very soon
developed frequency of micturition, had to get up 3
or 4 times at night to micturate, and had a general
sense of uneasiness in the Hypogastric Zone. He
became/
became very weak, and very pale and disinclined for
any exertion. At the end of 4 weeks he had several
shivering fits and was then sent into Hospital.
^Previous illness:- Malaria 8 months previous¬
ly. Short attacks. Occasionally now has a mild
rigor and sweating usually followed.by headache.
This resnonds readily to Quinine.
On admission he was very rale and emaciated.
Conjunctiva tinged with yellow. Had haemic murmurs
over his pulmonary and aortic areas and the "bruit
de diable" in the neck. Was constipated. Tem¬
perature normal except for a slight rise at night.
Urine alkaline in reaction contained blood
clots. The colour of the urine was of a dark red
"portwine." appearance, and gave the Guaiac and
Ozonic Ether reaction readily. No urinometer was in
stock so the specific gravity could not be ascer¬
tained. Had frequency of micturition both during
day and night and complained of the ever present
uneasiness, often actual pain, in the Hypogastric
region. Bladder not distended.
Microscopically pus cells, red blood corpuscles
and lymphocytes were abundant. Bilharzia ova were
extremely/
extremely abundant in the nests of mucus which lay
at the bottom of the glass containing the urine.
They lay moored "stern on" to the little clumps
of mucus and epithelial cells as seen through the
microscope." The spike at the end appeared to be the
"mooring agent" or the "anchor" On putting salt
solution on to the slide the ova became active and
moved rapidly about the slide. Some of the ova
appeared to be undergoing disintegration. These
ones lay still and did not move about with the rest.
These (?) disintegrating ova were deeply stained
with a yellowish pigment. .
Ptv. McGargle, 1st Welsh Re'gt. age 26.
In March 1902 reported himself as unfit for
duty. He was then at Norval's Pout. He then was
complaining of frequency of micturition. Had to
get up several times during the night to micturate.
Had smarting pain along the whole length of the
urethra when micturating. Passing blood, and
blood clots per urethram. Clots always appear at
the end of the act of micturition. Has been gett¬
ing weaker and paler during the period from the
onset of Haematuria. Has a constant uncomfortable
i
uneasy sensation over the Hypogastrium. No actual
pain in this region. The urine in this case con¬
tained blood, blood clots and abundant mucus.
Microscopically the ova of Bilharzia were as abun¬
dant as in the previous case and found in great
numbers in the clumps of mucus and epithelium.
The urine was alkaline in reaction. No pus cells
were present as in the former case.
The man was very anaemic and had the usual
haemic bruits at the base of heart. He had
palpitation and cardiac dyspnoea on the slightest
exertion.
Ptv. Harold, 1st Welsh.
In July 1901 he was sent to No 15, General
Hospital, Natal from Komati Poort as a "Convalescent
Malaria." Here he noticed that his urine was
blood stained. Shortly:afterwards he developed
frequency of micturition by day and night. Pain
at the root of the penis at the end of the act of
micturition and occasional passage of long shreddy
blood'clots■at the end of the:act. This man like¬
wise complained of Hypogastric pain and pain in the
loins.. These pains he described as being constant¬
ly present when'he was up or sitting on a chair but
disappeared on:lying down in bed. The frequency of
micturition was a very marked'feature in this case.
He stated that he often had to micturate about nine
or ten times during the night.
He had the usual signs of Anaemia - marked
pallor of face, lips, and gums, glistening conjunc¬
tiva. Haemic bruit at .the base of heart, - palpita¬
tion, dyspnoea on exertion. The urine w.as allsaline
in reaction. Contained a few pus cells, blood,
blood clots and ova of Bilharzia.
I have taken these 3 cases as examples of
Endemic Haematuria. The symptoms in these 3 cases
were well marked. In many of the cases I have
examined no blood clots were passed and the urine
was only faintly stained with blood. In some the
bleeding was profuse. In others it consisted only
of a slight trickle at the end of the act of mic¬
turition. The majority of the cases suffered from
cystitis. In some the cystitis was marked as in
the 3rd case above mentioned, whilst in others it
caused little inconvenience. In almost all of the
cases there was uneasiness, discomfort or actual
pain'over the Hypogastric region. This pain or
uneasiness was most marked immediately after the
act of micturition. I have not met with a case in
\
which the Rectum has been involved causing diarrhoea
passage of bloody mucus, and tenesmus. In all my
cases a rectal examination was made but the examina¬
tion in every one was" negative. The three cases
described suffered from marked anaemia. Many of
the cases presented no signs of anaemia or-ill
\
health. Undoubtedly many soldiers have had the
disease"in so mild'a form that practically no
symptoms/
symptoms at all were in evidence.
I have never heard of a death amongst the
troops in South Africa being directly attributed to
Bilharzia;although I made many inquiries on this
point from medical officers at various base hospitals
On one occasion while performing a post-mortem on a
South African Colonial trooper who had died of
Enteric Fever, I found some small hard somewhat
gritty areas on the trigone of his bladder. The
trigone of the bladder was excised and sent to
Major Beveridge, D.S.O., R.A.M.C. who examined the
tissue. He reported that the gritty elevations
were inflammatory thickenings due to the presence of
Bilharzia Haematobia in the submucous layer immed¬
iately subjacent.
The origin of the infection is still doubtful.
In case 1 the man developed the disease at Komati
Poort which is one of the hot-beds of Malaria and
Bilharzia. Komati Poort lies in a marshy country
watered by the Komati River. There are many pools
of stagnant water surrounded by tall reeds and the
soldiers quartered about the district used to bathe
in and fill their water bottles from the water in
these/
these pools. In case 1 the man-avers that he always
drank boiled water while at Komati except on one
occasion. While out fishing one day in the Komati
River he felt very thirsty and drank some water
from a small clear pool near the bank. Five days
afterwards the initial symptoms occurred.
Case 11 had been careless about the water he
drank. He stated that he had partaken of the
water from the Modder River, Crocodile River, &c. &c.
and from small streams round Harrismith, Kroonstadt
Barberton. In 1900 ho was in the Rustenburg
district, which is a stronghold of Bilharzia in the
Transvaal.
Case 111 evidently developed the disease like
Case 1 while in the Komati Poort district. He
took no precautions about boiling:water. He had
also been in the Nelspri/it district for several
months. This district is also infected.with
Bilharzia.
Treatment:- All cases were sent down to the
Base Hospitals and.most of them were sent to England
for change. The symptoms soon ceased on leaving
the infected district. For medicinal treatment I
prescribed/
Prescribed Iron and Quinine or Easton's Syrup as a
tonic or 'recuperant.' The patients certainly
required some medicine of this description. A
combination of Tincture of Hyoscyamus, Boracic Acid
and Infusion of BUCHU was given night and morning for
the Cystitis. Light diet, no alcoholic stimulant,
and rest in bed soon encouraged a very rapid improve¬
ment. In three cases where the urine was markedly
ammoniacal^nd contained pus and where Cystitis was
a prominent and painful symptom, I washed out the
bladder daily with weak Boracic lotion. This
measure soon effected improvement in the state of the
urine. In such a case as this it is quite possible
that the patient may develope a surgical kidney.
In all of the eases, the Cystitis^ Haemorrhage^
and subsequent Anaemia^soon disappeared and the
patients.rapidly gained strength. None of them
however could be written down as cures. The treat¬
ment at the best is not scientific. It will remain
unscientific as long as we treat the symptoms and
not the cause. Until an agent is found to act
specifically on the worms or ova through the blood,
our treatment is imperfect.
Sonsino Jin the British Medical Journal June
1385/
1885) maintained that "we have no means of curing
the infection of Bilharzia better than is done by
nature" - and that the "true prophylaxis is..
n
that only well filtered water should be drunk.
Dr. Harley, one of the earliest writers on this j
sub/ject, pointed out that the "Ova may be present in
the urine when all other signs of Existence of the
parasite have disappeared." This observation has
been frequently confirmed.
The ova remain as such in the urine. They
soon die. In pure or salt water the embryos break
through their shells and the ciliated bodies then
lash themselves along.at furious speed from place to
place. When.making microscopical examinations of
the ova, the easiest way to break the shell and let
out the embryos is to firmly.press the cover slip
on to the slide until the embryo begins to wriggle
out. !
j
An interestingpoint in connection with the
ova is that they perish in impure water. I have
frequently proved this to be so, and so has.Major
Beveridge, D.S.O. R.A.M.C. the Bacteriologist to the
Army at Pretoria.
Water taken from swampy reedy pools round
Pretoria/
Pretoria,was inimical to the life of the ova. Yet
it appears that it is by drinking the water of such
nools that the disease is contracted.
Prophylaxis is of vital importance in this affec¬
tion. To both officers and,men of the army during
the late war the importance of drinking nothing but
filtered or.boiled.water was being continually pointed
out by the army surgeons. Yet a most lamentable
ignorance and heedlessness prevailed.
The average soldier when thirsty filled his
water bottle from the nearest pool of water. In
many cases his officer did the same. Enteric Fever
and Bilharzia were often the consequence. Nearly all
of the columns at the later stage of the war possessed
Berkefield.Filters, but as a rule neither officers
nor.men were particular about seeing that the water
they drank had been,passed.through these filters.
^7
lyo, -^jC» ^\*^r~o-r^eO
'
f-^Us %~&*njr?£(x/-
|jU?W O '
%pV~*~)*-**—&ts lA^\rttvV»cja^^^j
ry - •*
Ias^A-^S CJU<^CC .
d
IW?
(~lL^e4-irlj /TiJLt^LZo Qrft^S
/try
X" Cfc-dA
&t~*^UL^o
O-V-tf .
-^xT &£s-\s^ij-<u£> .
Myelitis (?Syphilitic)_
Private Parfitt, Army Pay Department, was ad¬
mitted to No.19 General Hospital, Pretoria, on
30th May, 1902, suffering from 'Retention of Urine!.
The urine was drawn off with a catheter. The man
gave the following history and was detained in this
hospital for treatment.
For the previous eighteen months he had been a
clerk in the District Pay Office in Pretoria. Dur¬
ing this time he felt quite well and could perform
his duties well. On 30th May however, he found that
he was unable to pass water. About 11 o'clock in
the morning he went to the urinal to micturate, but
found when there, that although the desire to pass
water was quite strong, he was totally unable to void
any urine. Several times during the day he tried to
1
pass water, but always with the same result. He
reported himself to Hospital about 6 o'clock in the
evening, and, as above stated^he was detained and the
bladder emptied with a catheter. During the en¬
suing two weeks he was quite paralysed in his lower
'
extremities - limbs lay flaccid on the bed, knee
jerks absent, anaesthesia present over both lower
limbs. Sensation to heat and cold absent. Sensation to pain quite gone. Faeces passed involuntarily. Urine drawn off three times daily with a
catheter/
catheter. Urine then ammoniacal. Specific grav¬
ity 1023. Pus abundant. (The bladder had pro¬
bably become infected from the catheter, which was
passed by the ward orderly.) At the end of a week
he complained of a severe "girdle pain" round the
iliac bones just above the trochanters. This pain
was so severe that he required hypnotics in order
to obtain sleep at night. At the end of a fort¬
night sensation gradually returned in his lower limbs,
but rigidity slowly developed. Knee "jerks returned.
He shortly afterwards was able to move his legs a
little. When he did attempt movement spasms and
twitchings in the muscles occurred. This was most
marked in the left lower limb. Incontinence of
faeces still persisted. Instead of retention,
incontinence of urine now developed.
On 1st October this patient was handed over to
me for examination and for invaliding to England
as "unfit for further service as a soldier".
I saw him then for the first time and his con¬
dition was as follows. He was a poorly developed
man, muscularity .poor, anaemic. Lay comfortably on
a water bed and could move himself about. Conjunc¬
tivae markedly injected.
Nervous System:- Knee jerks extremely active.
A mere touch to the ligaraentum patellae sent the
legs into a clonus. Quadriceps jerk active and
exaggerated/
exaggerated. Ankle clonus present. Flexor re¬
sponse on tickling soles of feet. When he volun¬
tarily attempts to move his lifcbs, violent clonic
spasms occur. When he flexes the leg on thigh^and
lays the limb on the outer side the spasms stop.
On attempting extension they are again violently
produced. They are so severe that the whole bed
quivers when they occur. No girdle pain now pre¬
sent. Has frequent shooting pains of a severe
lancinating character down both lower limbs. Has
complete loss of control over sphincters of rectum
and bladder purine dribbles away continuously. On
making a rectal examination the finger is not grasp¬
ed by the sphincter ani. He states that he can
feel the urine passing, but has no control over it.
Same with faeces. Sensation to touch present but
delayed. Sensation to heat and cold is delayed,
but present as tested by hot and cold tubes. Sup¬
erficial reflexes present.- Spermatic reflex exsgi
gerated. No bed sores present - this is due to
careful nursing and a water bed. A history of
syphilis was elicited. He had a hard sore, rash
and throat symptoms five years ago and was in hosp¬
ital for a month under treatment for it. Took no
medicine after this. No history of rheumatism,
pneumonia, severe chills, wetting or fatigue.
Heart, lungs and other viscera normal. Urine alkal¬
ine/
ine, specific gravity 1022. Pus cells abundant.
Temperature normal.
No temperature chart came with this case. At
this date the temperature was 98.8°P. and the pulse
81 per minute.
Treatment: Up to the date when he came under
my care he had been taking strychnine and quinine
internally; massage had been applied to the muscles.
The condition had not been diagnosed and a history
of syphilis had not been inquired into. He was
handed over to my care for examination and report
and for invaliding.
It appeared to me that the case was one of
myelitis, probably of a specific nature, and sit¬
uated in the upper part of lumbar enlargement or just above this. The sudden onset (very much like a
haemorrhage) the retention of urine, and incontinence
of faeces, and then almost immediately a girdle sens¬
ation of pain and complete paralysis below this
gi'tdle, closely resembled an accute diffuse myelitis.
Then later on the return of heat and cold sensation,
spacticity instead of flaccidity, exaggerated knee
jerks and ankle clonus in place of the abolition of
deep reflexes - all these pointed to involvement of
the upper or central neuron.
The rectal and bladder centres had probably
been destroyed by softening.
None/
None of the usual causes of an acute myelitis
were ascertainable, except- syphilis, vis., no hist¬
ory of injury to spine, fevers, rheumatism, pneumonia,
fatigue, exposure to wet or cold.
For treatment I at once stopped the strychnine
and quinine which he had been having and gave the
following mixture.
R. Liquor Hydrarg.Perchlor. 1 drachm.
£ oz. six-hourly at first, for four days,
and then three times daily after meals.
The spine was dry cupped at different places
on alternate days. The dry cupping was performed
with urine test tubes. Water was boiled in these.
Then the water was poured out and the open end of
the tube pressed against the skin. Massage was
stopped as there seemed no indication for it in such
a spastic condition. Bladder washed out daily with
boric lotion.
The man was sent down to Cape Town by hospital
train en route for Netley six days after he came
under my care, and so I was unable to follow the
after history of the case. I was very anxious to
keep the case in order to observe the effect of the
mercury/
Potass Iodi.
Glycerin!
Aq. Anesi. ad
grs. xv
M. x.
-i- oz.
mercury and the iodide of potash.
This case differed from Erb's Syphilitic
Spinal Paralysis in that the onset was sudden: in
Erb's it is gradual. In Erb's paralysis the tendon
reflexes are exaggerated out of all proportion to
the muscular rigidity. In this case the two went
on pari passu. In Erb's, however, the girdle sens¬
ation is present as a rule, and the bladder and rec¬
tum are early involved.
Case 1. Bullet in Ulna.
I. Y. Private struck by a spent bullet at
Tweefontein. A"distinct lump could be felt over
the Posterior border of'the right-ulna in its upper
■part. Five inches■lower down there■was the outlet
of a tortuous sinus which evidently reached:up to
the hard'lump already mentioned. This opening'was
the wound of entrance of a bullet and the lump'felt
obviously was the bullet. Under chloroform"an
incision'was"made'over this'lump and a flattened out
Martini bullet was found to be lying partly embedded
in the'ulna.
It was easily extracted. The sinus was then
scraped. A small piece of metal cartridge■casing
was'found'lying in the wall of"the'sinus. Iodoform
was dusted on the wounds'and a gauze dressing:applied
Healed - without further'trouble.
I take"it that the bullet struck a stone or
some other obstacle'in its course"and then, glancing
off, struck this man. When struck he was retiring
with his rifle'at the trail. He says he only felt
a sharp burning'pain'at the time'and did not drop
his rifle.
^ ^ G^TT
-^'^JL-ti^J- ikr^^£ w-rO -<r*s ^-<u^3
Case 11.
Bullet Wound in Chest Wall. Metal Casing in Humerus.
1:1:02. This man an Imperial Yeoman states that
while'retiring at Tweefontein'he was struck on the
right side of the chest. Very 1 it-tie bleeding
occurred and a first field dressing was soon after¬
wards applied.
When -he came, under ray care Seven days afterwards
he had a small wound of entrance of a bullet in the
posterior axillary line on the right side and a
lacerated exit wound in front external to the nionle.
He complained of pain over the Right Biceps muscle in
the upper part of the arm. This pain had only come
on during the last 3 days. On examination a very
small healed scar could be both seen and felt in the
skin on the inner side of the Biceps muscle in the
upper part of the arm. One could feel some resis¬
tant structure on palpating over this scar. Pressing
on this caused pain to the patient. It was doubtful
whether this was cicatricial tissue or a foreign body.
The patient did not remember having been struck in
the arm. Under Cocaine locally injected I removed
a piece of cartridge metal casing. This casing,
which had sharp edges and was about the size of a
threepenny/
threepenny piece, was stuck half under the periosteum
of the bone and half outside it.
This man's arm must have been closely applied to his
side when he was struck. The bullet did not fracture
any ribs but ploughed its way through the Serratus
and pectoral muscles and emerged anteriorly. The
piece of metal casing probably was carried along with
the bullet, but left it at the wound of exit and
entered the arm.
Case IV.
This case somewhat resembles case 11. This
man a Yeoman, was struck on the left side of the chest
while endeavouring to take cover at Tweefontein. He
fainted at once. The entrance wound of the bullet
was situated over the 5th rib in the left nipple
line, ploughed its way towards the axilla anterior
to the rib and emerged through the skin at the pos¬
terior axillary line high up. The exit wound was
ragged and lacerated, and fibres of the Latissimus
Dorsi muscle protruded through it. The course of the
made
bullet could be easily* out on holding up the patient's
arm, by a long ridge of darkened and thickened skin.
Two weeks afterwards this track felt like a thickened
cord under the skin owing to the cicatricial indura¬
tion.

Case 111.
Shattering of shaft of Ulna in its upper third, from
a Bullet Wound.
Trooper J., Imperial Yeomanry struck by a bullet
at Tweefontern. Bullet entered through the muscles
on the anterior aspect of upper, tjiird of left forearm
and emerged posteriorly through1 .'the upper third of the
ulna. The ulna was shattered into dozens of splin¬
ters of bone and the haemorrhage at the time was stati ed to have been severe.
On 1:1:02 the man came under my care. He had
then a very large lacerated 'wound posteriorly over the
upper third of the Ulna. The wound of entrance had
almost healed. No nerves were injured. Under Chlor
oform all the splinters of bone were removed. A gap
into which one could put three fingers remained betweefi
the Olecranon and the rest of the shaft of the Ulna.
Cavity was drained with a tube inserted into the bottom
part of the wound. The skin edges at the upper part
were trimmed and held together with 2 interrupted silk¬
worm gut stitches. Limb then put up on a rectangular
splint. Movement of fingers and wrist carried out
when
gently daily. At the end of 4 weeks?the man was invalidid to England, a sinus still existed, and occa¬
sionally discharged minute gritty particles of bone.
a/? 2.
6 . /2~ • 6~~t.
*TJ C/ly9pJ<r
f ~M.st+-r^
In this case a suspicion arose that the bullet
which caused the injury must have been an "explosive
bullet" on.account of the marked comminution of the
bone. It may however have been caused by a
ricochet bullet. The bullet may have struck some
other object on the way and had its mantle torn,
thus exposing the leaden core, and transforming it
into an expanding bullet. If so one would have ex¬
pected a larger or a more irregular wound of entrance
than in this case. Also in an explosive bullet
wound one would expect to find a greater destruc¬
tion of skin than occurred in this case. I incline
to the oninion that this wound must have been in¬
flicted at a close range and that the bullet was
travelling at a high velocity. A very large number
of the wounded at Tweefontein were shot at close
range. Many of the Yeomanry were shot at close
quarters as they rushed and scrambled out of their
tents. The Boers under De Wet surprised the camp
and for a time all was chaos and confusion on our
side.
Case V.
Bullet wound o^ Thigh. Injury to Sciatic Kerve.
Drop Foot.
T'h is/
/Tx r S°/iPHe*ot/s
the External Saphenous is formed from cutaneous
branches of both the Internal and External Popliteal
In this case the injury to the nerve must have been
directly caused by the bullet, because the paralysis
developed at once. In many of the nerve lesions
following bullet wounds the paralysis does not
develop till weeks afterwards. It is then due to th
cicatricial tissue nulling upon the nerve and invol¬
ving it in the contracting area. The next case will
illustrate this.
Case VI.
Trooper Stevens, I.Y. was struck .by a bullet
in the uuoer part of the Right arm at Tweefontein.
A small circular drilled wound of entrance was
found situated immediately below the nectoralis
major muscle at its attachment to the Humerus.
The exit wound which was also small was situated
about the same level posteriorly. The bullet had
tissue
evidently torn its way through skin subcutaneous*and
deep fascia only. The man suffered no inconvenience
from the wound till the 5th day when he stated that
he felt tingling and occasional prickling.sensations
down the inner side of the upper arm and forearm.
On testing this area with a nin ana by touch
'impaired/
it*
/\NflF-S THF-TlC
- • •
/a/t Cutaneous aI £ RV £
- Bp HNCh ro DoR.s>m of For(e/^r^
/3L^OO' ICiSULs+s

?impaired sensation' was elicited. For instance on
touching lightly below the elbow .joint with the
finger, the man although he felt the touch.could not
say definitely where he was touched. Fourteen days
after the injury the area supplied by the Internal
cutaneous was quite anaesthetic. This area Is
indicated in the sketch. Here it appeared therefore
that the Internal cutaneous nerve had been caught up
by the cicatricial adhesions in the track of the
bullet. The ulnar nerve at its origin, entirely
escaped.
Case Vll.
Trooper Mills, I.Y. Wounded at Tweefontein.
The bullet entered below the Coracoid:Process on the.
Right side and emerged at the same level posteriorly.
Both wounds were clean drilled holes. On its course
the bullet crossed the Axillary artery (and as will
be seen, injured it) and the Brachial nerve trunks.
This man says that he saw the Boer fire at him
from a distance of about ten yards. There was a
great deal of bleeding from the front wound, but this
was easily arrested by the pressure of a Pad and
bandage. He was admitted to Hospital with paralysis
of the extensor muscles of the Forearm. He was
totally unable to extend his fingers, but he could
flex them easily. Flexion and extension at the elbow
.joint could be carried out perfectly. He extended
his forearm.in a slow and laboured manner. I was
very doubtful whether the Supinator Longus was active.
He certainly could supinate his forearm but it appear¬
ed to me that the Biceps was principally concerned in
the movement.
Sensation was present over the front and back of
the hand and fingers but was impaired over the ulnar
and raoiial sides of the Thumb. Sensation was abol¬
ished over the outer side of the upper arm and fore¬
arm as far as the wrist.
Evidently then it was the Musculo Spiral nerve
which was injured. It could not have been completely
cut across because then the Triceps would have been
paralysed and sensation would have been abolished
over the area supplied by the -Radial nerve. The
posterior Interosseous nerve was paralysed and the
cutaneous branches of the Musculo Spiral supplying
the outer part of the arm and forearm:as far as the
wrist were also put out of action. But why did
some fibres escape while others were injured?
The:musculo spiral nerve arises from the
posterior/
posterior cord of the Brachial Plexus by a common
trunk with the Circumflex nerve and is afterwards
.joined by the posterior division of the trunk formed
by the junction of the 8th cervical and first dorsal
nerves. (Gray's Anatomy) Is it not uossible that
the bullet caught up the trunk before it was .joined by
the posterior division of the 8th cervical and first
dorsal, or again perhaps it is this posterior division
which was injured.
The area of anaesthesia on the outer aspect of
the arm and forearm closely corresponds to the sensory
distribution of the 5th spinal nerve root. (see
diagram taken from Judson Bury's Clinical Medicine.)
One other point remains in this interesting case
and that is, a small aneurism developed under the site
of the anterior cicatrix. The heaving pulsation
synchronous with the cardiac systole was quite marked.
On compressing the subelavian artery the aneurism
disappeared. The bullet had evidently torn the
artery wall or injured it, in its passage and the
traumatic aneurism developed.
Owing.to the great demand for beds at this time
in the Hospital, this man was sent to'England by
Hospital ship.

Case Vlll.
Gunshot Wound. Left Trochanter and Thigh.
This man, a trooper in the I.Y. was wounded at
Tweefontein while lying on the ground behind a small
ant heap. Over the left Trochanter was a very large
ragged wound which bled smartly for about three or 4
minutes.
On probing this wound in Hospital at Howick, I
was surprised to find three sinuses leading away from
it into the deeper tissues. One ran anteriorly and
inwards. At the bottom of this sinus was a large
piece of metal casing from a cartridge. Another
sinus led backwards toward the gluteal region, a
smaller niece of metal casing lay.at the bottom of
this. A third sinus not so long as the others,
pointed directly downwards, a niece of Khaki cloth lay
at the bottom of this. The whole wound was carefully
cleansed &-ertr and an Iodoform dressing applied.
Four days after the man directed my attention
to a small lump which he had felt with his hand,
lying lower down on the outer.part of the thigh and
six inches away from the previously described wound.
On cutting on to this little hard body I found a
piece of lead about the size of the nose of a Mauser
bullet/
A J^rzd-'O t~&.sls
^ /a^ttrw^. (Usza^
1
bullet. It fas easily extracted as it lay .just unde
the deep fascia.
This man was evidently struck by a ricochet
bullet travelling at a low velocity.
This was the 6th cose from.which I had extrac¬
ted nieces of metal casing. It certainly seems odd
that the bullet should carry metal casing.with it in
its flight. Yet it cannot be a rare thing. The
six cases, in which I found the casing, were all
wounded during the fight at Tweefontein on 25th
December, 1902.
Being interested in this connection! went
through all the trenches occupied by the Boers and
by our own men at the battles of Geluk and Bergendal
in the Eastern Transvaal. There were hundreds of
empty Mauser,.Lee.Metford, Martini, and Mannlicher
Cartridges lying in these trenches. I collected
25 of these emrty cartridge cases showing bits torn
off at the rim where the bullet had been grasned.
Some of the bits torn off were very small, some
were as large.as a sixpenny piece. These bits
evidently had accompanied the bullets in their
flight. Being share and ■ .jagged^ if they caught a
nerve/
nerve or an artery they could easily inflict serious
damage to these structures.
i Case IX.
i
Gunshot Wound. Face and Eye.
This man, a trooper in the I.Y. was wounded at
Tweefontein. One bullet travelling transversely,
cut his upper lin. Another travelling in the same
direction struck the external angular process of the
left frontal bone, and after piercing the left eye¬
ball, smashed the nasal bones and so emerged.
Four days afterwards his left eye was removed in
Harrismith Stationary Hosoital. A fortnight after
this he came under my care. He said that during
the fortnight after the extraction of the left eye
he could see figures and distinguish men in the
ward. Then his vision became cloudy and obscure.
At this time, 18 days after the fight, he was
unable to distinguish light from darkness. His
Iris was firmly adherent.all round the lens.
(Atropine had evidently not been used) Marked
conjunctivitis was uresent. The optic disc looked
cloudy. This was probably a case of Sympathetic
Ophthalmia and the Prognosis was not encouraging.
^5* "^i-t^c-o ty *&-€■<^ais
CtsMspO J^e.-'C-cjss_
I
Case X.
Haeraothorax.
This man, a trooper in the Yeomanry was wounded
at Tweefontein on 25:12:01. The bullet struck him
over the.middle of the Right Scapula, pierced the
bone and lung and emerged below the nipple on the
right side. He had Haemoptysis directly after having
been struck. He was admitted to the Stationary
Hospital at Harrisraith and while there felt quite well.
On 27th Deer, he was sent by Hospital train to I5~
General Hosnital, Natal. He walked from the train to
the Hospital, a distance of about 500 yards and then
told the nursing sister in the ward that he was
11 feel ing very ill."
On examination one saw the entrance and exit
wounds in chest as above described. The man was
flushed and sweating. Temperature 100*5. Pulse 83
and Respirations 24 per minute. The right side of
the chest did not expand on respiration and on taking
a deep breath the patient complained of pain in the
right side. On Percussion, absolute dulness was
present over the.whole of the bass of the Right
Lung as high up as the 3rd intercostal space.
Aegophony heard at the upper margin while over the
dull/
dull area the breath sounds were inaudible. Vocal
Fremitus and Resonance quite absent over the dull
area. Skodaic resonance nresent at uorer margin of
dull area. The diagnosis of fluid in the Pleural
Cavity, probably Haemothorax was at once clear. He
passed a restless night and next morning. 29th, his
condition was.much worse. He was now slightly
cyanosed and in great respiratory distress. Spoke
o
in a whisoer. Temperature 103 F. Respirations
between 24 and 26 per minute. The Respiratory excurdion was very shallow. Pulse volume good. As his
distress was so marked I
tapped his chest in the Right
Mid Scapular line at the 7th interspace and drew off
nineteen ounces of sero-sanguineous fluid which close¬
ly resembled port wine in appearance. Fomentations,
which had been applied from the first, were still
continued.
In the evening he was much better. Slept three
hours during the day and woke up feeling hungry.
The great distress had in a large measure disappeared
but his breathing.was still short and 'gasping' in
character. Temperature 102. Pulse good. The
course of the case after this was quite uneventful.
In four weeks the fliud had quite disappeared except
for/
for an area of slight comparative dulness at the
right base. In six weeks he was allowed up and
was eventually sent home to England for a change.
At this time the man though to all intents
cured got breathless on doing any physical exertion
such as a smart walk. This probably was due to
some adhesions between the lung and bhe pleura.
Remarks:- In this case I take it that the
Haemothorax did not develop immediately after the
wound. The man felt very well until after the
train journey- and the walk from the station to
Hospital. It was this exertion that must have
caused the bleeding into the pleural cavity.
In this regard the conclusions of Making in his
"Surgical Experiences in South Africa 1899-1900."
are noteworthy. He says "During the early part of
the campaign on the Western side I saw a large
number of chest wounds, and had I been asked my
opinion as to the relative frequency of occurrence
of Haemothorax I should have placed it at about 30
per cent. The patients in these early battles
needed little wagon transport and when sent down to
the Base travelled in comfortable ambulance trains."
At a later stage in the campaign when the patients
had/
had to undergo a three days and nights' .journey to
Stationary Hospitals, Mr. Makins calculated that at
least 90 per cent, of the chest cases developed
Haemothorax.
A"point of interest in this case is the com¬
paratively sudden fall of temperature to normal, on
aspirating some of the fluid. All of the fluid was
not aspirated. The common practice in treating
cases of Haemothorax was if possible (1) leave the
fluid alone'and let nature absorb it or (2) if
necessary by reason of Dyspnoea and distress to tap,
do not remove.all the fluid. If all the fluid is
aspirated there is a tendency to a secondary Haemorr
hage and a return of the symptoms-perhaps due to the
sudden relief of pressure on the Intercostal vessels
which are the usual sources of Haemorrhage in cases
of Haemothorax from Gunshot wounds.—
Case XI.
This case is interesting on account of the
multiplicity of Wounds. The man was in the thick o
the.fight at Tweefontein. One bullet struck him on
the right cheek and emerged through the hard palate
into the mouth. What became of this.bullet no one
knows/
knows. The man does not remember it going out of
his mouth and the Rontgen Rays have failed to localise
it.
Another bullet entered at the lower angle of the
left scapula and emerged to the left of the arex of
the heart. No Haemothorax developed. Had a slight
Haemoptysis at the time.
A third bullet tore through the skin and muscles
in front of the chest and did no further damage.
A fourth bullet, spent, struck him over the
Right Tibia and embedded itself in the bone. The
only complaint he made after all these injuries was
that "he had lost the sense of feeling in the right
side of his palate and that he could not chew biscuits
so well as he used to."
Case Xll.
Multiple Keloids.
This case was that of a trooper in the Queensland
Imperial Bushman. He also had been several times
wounded during the "drives" in the Transvaal and
Orange River Colony. All the scars left from the
bullet wounds tg>ok on a Keloid formation.
He had one big Keloid scar behind the right upper
arm/
arm. One on the right forearm. One very large one
on the right thigh. This one was growing fairly
rapidly. He had another one on the left leg. The
man states that any cuts and injuries he received whe
a child healed up rapidly.
The large Keloid on the thigh was the only one
that was at all tender. The surface of the Keloids
was smooth, glistening and raised. Small venules
were present at the periphery. Projecting "claws"
or processes of fibrous tissue radiated irregularly
from the periphery outwards.
Case Xlll.
Gunshot Wound of Upper and Lower Jaw.
This man was shot at night by a sentry at
Tigerskloof. The sentry mistook him for a Boer and
fired without challenging. The bullet entered the
right cheek, perforating the maxillary antrum and
smashing off.a triangular piece of bone from the
right upper jaw. The bullet then travelled across
the mouth, and shattered the ramus of the.lower jaw
on the left side. Then emerging through the skin it
burtied itself in the upper part of the left Deltoid,
ploughed its way through the fibres of this muscle
and/
and emerged through the skin about the insertion of
the Deltoid, leaving a large irregular wound of exit.
The bullet.must have been travelling at a high rate of
velocity.
Four days after the accident the man was admitted
to Hospital under my care. All the wounds were then
reeking with foul smelling pus, the face was enormous¬
ly swollen and the man was in very considerable pain.
The mouth was douched hourly with weak antiseptic
lotions. Liquid diet ordered and X ounces Port Wins
daily. On 23:2:02 (5 days after the infliction of
the wound) unaer chloroform the exit wound at the
angle of the .jaw was enlarged, and seven loose frag¬
ments of bone were removed from just anterior to the
massetcr muscle. A horizontal fracture extended
from the shattered area for about 2 inches towards
the Symphisis raenti. The area was thoroughly cleaned,
and a rubber drainage tube inserted.
On examining the wound, of the right upper jaw a
triangular wedge of bone was found to have been broken
off. This, at the time of the accident, must have
j
|
opened the maxillary antrum. The mucous membrane
i
of the antrum however, had afterwards become swollen
and ©edematous and now blocked up this opening, for on
plunging/
plunging a closed Kocher's artery forceps into the
antrum through this opening a great gush of exceed¬
ingly fetid pus occurred. Cavity was then syringed
out with Euthymol lotion and the opening made
patent. A plug of Cyanide gauze was then inserted
firmly into the antrum.
The wound in the deltoid was then cleaned, and
the usual dressings applied.
Douching and gargling were carried out 2 hourly
during the next day. On the 2nd day the gauze plug
was removed from the antrum, and a lightly packed one
inserted in its place. The man meanwhile took his
milk, Bovril, Chicken Tea and Port Wine. He rapid¬
ly improved. The mouth became clean and the
offensive odour"of his breath disappeared. The
tube at the angle of the .jaw was removed on the 7th
day and the gauze plug on the 8th day.
I had the man under observation for three weeks
after this. He then daily syringed out the maxill¬
ary antrum.and the mouth, with a lotion containing
Euthymol (one drachm to the ounce of water) The
external wound at the angle of the jaw had closed.
He could eat minced.meat, potatoes and vegetables
and masticate thin bread and hu.tter with comfort.
The/
The lower jaw was still freely movable at the seat of
union
fracture but fibrous tissue' was taking place.
A cork was fashioned to plug the opening in the
antrum at meal times, ana this acted efficiently, the |
patient being able to insert it with ease and comfort.
This case followed the usual course of injuries
to the raouth and .jaws. The wounds became septic as
a rule but by frequent douching and syringing with
weak antiseptic.lotions:the injured areas became
clean. Healing as a rule was rapid owing to the
great vascularity of the parts.
Case XIV.
Tpr. J.U.S., Imperial Yeomanry, struck by bullet
at Tweefontein at the left border of the Erector
I
!
Spinae .just above the sacrum.
i
Bullet emerged about three inches higher up over !
i
the Right Erector Spinae. The interest in the case ijs
the exit wound which is of the "expanding" or "explos¬
ive" type. The skin was very much torn, lacerated,
and everted at the exit:wound. The entrance wound
was small and circular.
A somewhat similar wound is described" by Mr.
Makins in bis "Surgical Experiences in South Africa"
page/
page 100. In his case the exit wound was very much
larger than in this case.
vVounds of the back in this situation were fair¬
ly frequent during the war.
'* s&r\*j~t>r -^7--gH^-0~■
yt^b ClsCA^J-^O ^
/C/


Abscess of Apex of Lung Due to Lodgement of a Bullet:.
Extraction of Bullet: Recovery.
!
!
History.- Corporal R., aged 27. of the Imperial !
j
Yeomanry, was struck by a bullet in th'e back while in
action at Tweefontein on Christmas Day, 1901. This
yeoman was in a trench when he was ordered by his
officer to retire to another position. While retir- |
ing he was struck by the bullet in the back, ran
forward a few more races then fell, and, as he states,!
Ii
"coughed un a mouthful of blood." He was shortly
afterwards conveyed in an ambulance to Harrismith
Hospital, Where he remained:till January 31st, 1902.
He was then transferred to No.15 General Hospital,
Howick, where he came under my care.
i
I
State on Admission.- He was very anaemic and
i
i
weak, had an irritative cough, and a temperature of
. o
99 7 F. Situated above the seine of the right
scanula on a level with the second rib was a large
irregular wound with gaping edges and dirty granula¬
tions. This was the wound of entrance of the bullet;
there was no wound of exit.- On probing this wound
one came on the second rib, which was here denuded
of periosteum and partially fractured. The expan¬
sion of the right apex of the lung was impaired, and
a/ _
a dull note was obtained on percussing above and
slightly below the clavicle. The.respiratory sounds
were very distant and feeble on listening over the
i - ' - ..
j'
; apex with a stethoscope.
I
I
Operation.- On January 22nd, 1902, under an
anaesthetic this wound was enlarged. A piece of lead
about the size of a pea was found embedded in the rib.
This was removed, and about 1 in. of the rib was then
i
| cut away with bone forceps in order to give free room
| for exploring the apex. The lung was firmly adherent
| to the rib and felt hard and resistant. On plunging
a closed Kocher's artery forceps into this resistantarea, a quantity of pus gushed forth. The forceps
I
were then withdrawn with the blades widely open, and
the finger inserted into the abscess cavity. At
once some hard foreign.bodies were felt, and on extrac¬
tion these proved to be a piece of lead, twisted and
indented, and about the size of a small marble, three
!small.pieces of the.metal casing of'a cartridge, a i
i
I... -
piece of cloth, and two small chips of bone. The
walls of the cavity felt very firm, A large rubber
ldrainage tube was then inserted, and the wound was left
!
open. On recovering from the anaesthetic he coughed
violently and expectorated some blood-stained mucus.
After-History/
After-History.- On January 3rd his condition was
o
not promising. His temperature ran up to 101 , he
i
had frequent coughing and brought uu pus and mucus
|
by the mouth. All over his right lung coarse bubbl- j
ing rales were heard. By January 3th.all these bad
signs had cleared up; no expectoration of pus, no
rales, and normal temperature. The drainage tube
was taken out on the seventh day after the operation
and the wound then closed rapidly. He left the
Hospital for England on March 9th perfectly well.
Remarks:- I take it that the bullet had entered
the anex of the lung, and set up the haemoptysis
i
which he had'immediately after having been struck:
|
that it had then become surrounded.by dense fibroid
i
tissue, and that the abscess had, so to sneak, become !
encysted. During the operation the walls of the j
abscess cavity had been broken and loosened at places,|
and some of the pus had evidently got into the air
spaces■and.bronchi,.and so set up the septic bronchi¬
tis which followed immediately after the operation.

Traumatic Aneurysm in Left Groin: Ligature of
Left Common Iliac: Recovery.
S
uimimmnimnm
The following case is of marked interest, add¬
ing as it does, one more to the very meagre list of
recoveries from the formidable operation of liga¬
ture of the common iliac artery.
History.- Private J.S., of the Victorian.Mount¬
ed Rifles,.aged 31, while in action against the
Boers near Vryheid, Transvaal, received a bullet
wound in the left groin. He states that he fell
off his horse a few minutes afterwards owing to
faintness. He was at once conveyed to Hospital,
and remained in bed for three or four.weeks. Was
then sent down to the hospitals'at Dundee phMooi
River, and finally to the Convalescent Depot at
Howick, Natal./ All this time he says he felt very
weak, and walked with a decided limp. Had frequent
pains in the left groin, and felt a hard lump there.
While at the depot he met with an accident. A
soldier fell on him, driving the knee.with great
violence into the left groin of the■already injured
man. This was followed by acute pain, increased
swelling in the groin, faintness,:and inability to
use the limb. He was admitted into the surgical
wards/
wards of No. 15 General Hospital, Howick, on November
18th, 1901.
State on Admission.- He looked thin and wasted,
and very pale. He lay on his back, and moved with
difficulty owing to the rain in his left groin. On
examining the groin the healed wound of entrance of
a bullet was found, situate about three fingerbreadths
above Foumart's ligament, and internal to the course
of the external iliac artery. The wound of exit was
situated below the crest of the ilium on the same
side. The bullet had on its way directly crossed the
line of the external iliac artery (and as the case
will show, wounded that artery high up), pierced the
iliac bone, and emerged externally. The skin of the
left inguinal region was erythematous, and tender to
touch. The oblique inguinal glands were enlarged
and painful. A marked bulging was easily observed,
situated above Pourart's ligament, and below and
external to the umbilicus. By laying the hand over
this area a heaving pulsation, synchronous with the
cardiac systole, could be felt. The whole area felt
boggy to the touch. By compressing the aorta slight¬
ly (this caused the patient excruciating pain) the
pulsations in the mass were distinctly lessened. There
were/
were no bruits in the heart to account for the marked
systolic bruit heard on placing the stethoscope over
the swollen:area. The diagnosis of:aneurysm of the
external iliac artery was therefore arrived at with
comparative certainty. From the history one could
deduce that an:aneurysm must have formed after the
bullet wound, that this aneurysm had been probably
increasing slowly or had begun to coagulate,:and that
the injury he received shortly before his admission
to Howick Hospital had probably ruptured the sac and
occasioned a fresh outpouring of blood from the torn
artery.
Progress and:Treatment.- The patient was nut to
bed, with the limb elevated and bandaged from toes to
hip, lead and opium fomentations were applied to the
groin to reduce the inflammation of the inguinal glands
already referred to; given a smart purge, and put on
.milk diet. November 19th.-Patient very restless;
complains of agonizing pains in the left groin and
hip; cannot sleep; given morphine subcutaneously.
0
Temperature 130'5', and rising. The aneurysmal mass
is distinctly larger: the outer part of the aneurysm
feels.more resistant than the inner: systolic bruit
over mass is very loud. A large pad was placed over
the/
the aorta, and a firm bandage applied to hold it in
place. This r>ad gives the patient: a great deal of
pain. November 22nd.-Temperature 101'2°. Inflam¬
mation of inguinal glands has disanpeared: aneurys¬
mal mass larger: patient extremely weak and restless:
still has the acute pain in the left groin'and hip.
. o
November 23rd.-Temperature 101 6 . The aneurysm is
now about one fingerbreadth below the umbilicus, and
has extended well into the middle line, heaving nulsations very marked. A consultation was held to-day,
and it was agreed that without operation the patient's
chance was horeless. on account of the extreme
rapidity with which the aneurysm was growing. Pro¬
longed compression of the abdominal aorta under an
anaesthetic was out of the question owing to the
patient's enfeebled state, and owing to the danger
of rupturing the thin sac of the aneurysm. The
patient was accordingly prepared for operation.
Operation.-An incision was made from a point II
inch above and external to the centre of Poupart's
ligament to 1 in. above and internal to the left
anterior superior spine, cutting.through the skin
and various muscle and fascial layers. This incision
exposed the aneurysm sac, which looked extremely thin
and/
and felt,very soft. One could not get above the sac.
by this incision, so it was -prolonged upwards in a
slight, curve, with the convexity downwards and out¬
wards. The peritoneum was exposed and incised, and
the intestines held back by warm sterile cloths.
The sac could now be clearly defined. It was found
to extend over to the brim of the pelvis and well
outwards into the iliac fossa. The external iliac
artery could not be defined. The common iliac enter¬
ed directly into the aneury smal mass, and the inter¬
nal iliac emerged'from the upper part of the mass.
All hope of tying the external iliac was therefore
abandoned: the iliac vein, therefore, having been
defined'and separated, a double silk ligature was
then tied, round the common iliac artery in two places
close to the aneurysm, and the artery divided between
the ligatures. Pulsation immediately ceased:in the
internal iliac and over the aneurysm. The incision
was then closed in the ordinary way, the peritoneum
and muscles and skin being brought together separate¬
ly, and a sealed dressing applied. The limb was
surrounded evenly with thick layers of cotton wool,
and a flannel bandage firmly applied from the toes
to the hip. He was put bed and surrounded by hot
water/
VMRCfAr,
/Sr. tf.
• •
- DEEP /Tpigrstric ACoivjmorJ ILIftc lA^reR/
Co/vjMOftl lui\c Venvl
Wre/{MAL IL/y^T£^
water bottles. He took the anaesthetic badly, and
had to be frequently stimulated with strychnine,
ether, etc., during the operation.
November 24th. Had a restless night. Given
morphine subcutaneously. Pulse volume and tension
o
good. Temperature 100 F.
November 25th. Bandage round limb not disturb¬
ed. Patient weak, but takes milk:and chicken-tea
well. Says that he "cannot feel his left leg."
. o
Temperature 98 4 .
November.26th. Vomited several times during
the night. No abdominal distension. Pulse good.
Kept on nutrient enemata for eight hours with sips of
warm water by mouth. Bandage round;limb.removed.
The left lower limb is.much colder than the right.
Roots of the toes very oedematous. Limb.looks very
blanched. Below the knee the skin is quite anaes¬
thetic. No pulsation present in tibial or popliteal
Again bandaged as before.
November 27th. Several large watery blebs
have formed on the leg and foot. Still anaesthetic
below knee. Toes still oedematous. Limb colder
than right, but has a certain degree of warmth:of
its own. General condition•fair. Has not had any
pain/
pain in the groin since the operation, and sleeps
well during.the day and night.
November 50th. Temperature of:left limb is
now almost equal to that of right. The anaesthetic
area below the knee has now disappeared, and patient
complains of pain in his calf. Can now "feel" his
leg. but says it is"as heavy as lead." The blisters
and oedema of toes have gone.
December 22nd. Circulation in.limb freely
established. Temperature of two:limbs equal. On
grasping limb firmly, the skin becomes pale, and
when pressure is relaxed a rosy blush follows. No
pulsation is present. The patient can extend.and
flex his limb quite freely. Massage is being
carried out daily to the left limb.
January 20th,1902. Moves leg freely. Can
extend, flex, and rotate easily, but is unable.to
lift the whole leg up vertically.while lying on his
back.
January 22nd. Up on a wheeled chair. Is
putting on flesh daily.
January 23rd. Up on crutches. Gets along
well. Puts left foot to the ground at intervals.
February 3rd. Can.walk about slowly without
the/
the aid of crutches or stick. A hard firm mass
about the size of:a goose egg can be felt in the
left.iliac fossa.
Remarks:- The.question arises in this case
whether, having cut down on the sac, one should not
have carried out Syme's operation - namely incising
the sac, turning out the bloot clot, and catching
all the bleeding points. This is a much.more for¬
midable and prolonged operation than simple liga¬
ture and statistics show that secondary Haemorrhage
is not an uncommon sequel. Again, should one have
tried prolonged compression of the abdominal aorta
under an anaesthetic? Against this.method one
must place the extremely weak state of the patient.
The anaesthetic would have had to be carried out
for several hours, and the patient could.not have
undergone this. During the short time he was under
the anaesthetic, while .the operation was being per¬
formed, he was weak and collapsed and constantly
required stimulation. The fact that this patient
was cured, and able to walk about ten . weeks after
the operation is sufficient: justification for the
procedure adopted. One other point of interest is
the/
the collateral circulation which in this case must
have been largely carried out by the anastomosing
lumbar, circumflex and lower intercostals,:with
assistance from the pudics, inferior haemorrhoidals,
and sacral arteries. The deep epigastric and deep
circumflex iliac arteries fortunately came off
below the aneurism.
The literature on. the sub.ject of ligature ofthe Common Iliac artery is interesting. The
mortality from the operation, immediate and remote,
is undoubtedly high. The Medical Times of July . 19th
1834 quotes from the Philadelphia Medical News of
April 5th 1834 a summary of this operation in 79
recorded cases. '•—
The vessel has been tied fortCD Haemorrhage. - 28 cases with 24 deaths.
(2) Cure for Aneurism - 43 cases with 28 deaths.
(3) For Pulsating Tumours indicating aneurism.
5 cases with 4 deaths.
(4) Preliminary, to stop Haemorrhage as in a
removal of a tumour or amputating at the Hip
Joint. 3 cases,.all died.
Kummell is quoted.in this article as an advocate
of the view that it (i.e. ligature of Common Iliac)
is "preferable to ligature of the External Iliac
for/
for aneurism of that vessel situated high up" because
of less liability to gangrene. The Compiler of the
above statistics however does not consider this
sound surgery.
Smith (American Journal of Medical Science, vol.
xl. up. 7-46, year 1860) collected: Statistics showing
that ligature of the External iliac gives a.mortality
of 28% and ligature of the Common iliac a mortality
of 77%. Up to this date there had been 15 cases of
ligature of the Common iliac for aneurism (14 males
1 female) with 5 recoveries. Secondary Haemorrhage
seems to have been the cause of death in most of the
cases.
The methods adopted for ligaturing this impor¬
tant vessel have been various. In.almost all record¬
ed cases the Extra peritoneal:method:has - been carried
out.
In a case reported by Jamieson (Lancet March 6th,
1886) a novel operation was performed. A woman aged
23 had a large pulsating:aneurism'above:Poupart's
ligament on the right side. Its size was stated:to
-JX/3 "trlcj
beAas a foetal head. In the words of this operator
"from the extent of the:tumour:it■seemed■impossible
to expose the common iliac artery by operating on the
right/
right side." His incision:was therefore made,
down to the peritoneum, in the left groin, and the
•peritoneum pushed:aside till the - Right common iliac
artery was reached. .This:was then tied with silk.
The Intraperitoneal method, has, so far, had
few successful exponents. Treves "Operative Surgery"
text book, 1891, states in reference:to the Intra¬
peritoneal method. "I am not aware that the
operation has been carried out upon the living
subject." In the British Medical Journal, October
29th, 1892, a very interesting question was propounded by Mr. Maraaduke Shield in "A Query in
Operative Surgery" viz. "Now that it is acknowledged
on all sides that aseptic wounds of the peritoneum
are safe and heal rapidly"it is worth putting the
question to our leading authorities on operative
surgery, whether the old operations for ligature
of the IIiac arteries are:altogether:advisable.
Their'principal merit was avoidance of wounds of the
peritoneum. The great drawback the difficulty of
the operation and the extensive wound•in the abdomi¬
nal walls."
In reply to the above (British:Medical Journal,
Novr. 5th, 1892) Mr. Lucas stated that in 1889 he
"acted/
Tacted on the belief:in favour of Intraperitoneal
operating:'and : ligatured the common iliac artery
through:a median"laparotomy incision for a rapidly
increasing aneurism of the External iliac." The
patient recovered.
Stevenson (B.M.J. 25th Jan, 1896) reports a
case of "Transperitoneal ligature of Common iliac
artery for diffuse tramuatic aneurism of the External
iliac and common Femoral arteries." In this case
first an incision was.made in the.middle line, the
peritoneal cavity opened and a silk ligature tied
round the left common iliac artery. The wound was
then closed in the usual way. When the man had
fully recovered from this operation, a second one
was performed by cutting directly into the old
aneurisrrial sac, and turning out.2* pounds of blood
clot.
This second operation was evidently done to
prevent the clot suppurating. In ray own case such
a measure would have been quite unnecessary.and I
certainly should not adopt this procedure unless signs
of suppuration manifested.
In the Medical:and:Surgical History of the.war
of the Rebellion (American Civil War) Pt. 11. p. 333,
four/
four cases of.ligature of the Common Iliac.artery are
recorded by Dr. Otis. The 1st case died 3 months
after the operation from exhaustion.and debility.
The 2nd case died.2 days after the operation from
secondary Haemorrhage.
The 3rd case died four days after the operation
from suppuration in Sac and Gangrene. The 4th case
died four days after the operation. In the 4th
case the peritoneal cavity.was opened during the
operation and.the immediate cause of death was
peritonitis. The first"two of these:cases were
gunshot wounds on the groin and buttock. The
third was a bayonet wound of the buttock and groin.
The fourth case was an aneurisirlal varix of the
femoral artery and vein from;a punctured wound
below Poupart's ligament.
In the American Journal of.Medical Science!vol
xl pp.7-46, 1860) it is stated.that Gibson of
Philadelphia first performed the operation:in;1812,
but.Mott's case performed in 1827 was the 1st sucessful case on record.
I have looked through the tables of operations
compiled by the late Sir Wm. MacCormac in his "Notes
and Recollections of an Ambulance Surgeon" but can
■
find/
find no mention of the common.iliac having been
ligatured for gunshot wounds. The records .here
referred to the cases:treated:at various base
hosnitals:and:ambulance stations during the FrancoPrussian Campaign of 1870.
It will not be out of nlace here to refer
briefly to Syme's brilliant operation in a case of
Iliac Aneurism. Professor Syme before the Royal
Medical and Chirurgical Society on May 27th 1862,
related a case of "Iliac Aneurism remedied by open¬
ing the Sac and tying the common iliac and the
internal iliac arteries." (Medical Times and
r -
Gazette, 14th June, 1862) The case was that of a
seaman aged 31, who had a large aneurism in the left
groin. "The aneurism extended from below Pounart's
ligament considerably higher up than the umbilicus
and from two inches beyond the middle line of the
abdomen towards the fight side completely across the
left iliac region so as to overlap the crest of the
IIium."
An incision was made into the sac. Six pounds
of blood and blood clot was scooped out. The oneningsof the external iliac and internal■iliac'were
then tied .
It/
It is interesting•to•note, in■this - classic
operation, that Lister's screw clamp was used to
compress the abdominal aorta.
Ligature of the common Iliac artery is assuredly
a grave operation.- grave in results, but not in
mere surgical technique. - The operation of tying
the vessel intraperitoneally is a simple anatomical
dissection. In my own case the soft fluctuating
sac alone gave me cause for anxiety. One can avoid
rupturing the sac hy exercising patience and gentle¬
ness in manipulating the tissues^
The gravity of the operation of course is much
diminished in:cases of traumatic, aneurism where the
artery is healthy and where the patient is robust.
I attribute a great deal of the success in my case
to the fact that the collateral circulation had, in
a measure been started before I operated. Where
a
large■pulsating aneurism of a main-artery exists,
it follows that the smaller vessels'above and below
gradually take on a little more work. Especially
is this the case if clotting in the sac commences.
In this case clotting must have been going on.well
until the man met with his accident.
J
~^AJ~(jTr-*f^t^P_j ^tSSCjg/^ ■**—•* ^vE-C*/"
yH^TT S&S^S fjj^. -^SruW-Jj^ y7"
(j^)
2-^? " 'Ar-c-^iC'
C ^ y -*c^i^v <t^<^yfyj
/&(^C^Cm-^C, s^C*.*\t*t
sy C^UyC^C^jg^~S
Gunshot Wound of Abdomen: Traumatic Aneurysm of
Femoral Artery: Amputation through Thigh.
The following case is of interest., not only from
the grave sequelae following on a gunshot wound of the
abdomen, but also for the splendid "power of resis¬
tance" of the man who was- struck.
History (for which i am indebted to the medical
officers of Vryheid Hospital).-Sergeant.P., of the
i
7th New Zealand Mounted Rifles, during a skirmish
'
I with the Boers.at Oraneedale on October :17th, 1901,
1
was struck by a Mauser bullet at a range of about 400
| yards. The bullet passed.between the radius and
ulna of the right.arm, then through his.water-bottle
and then entered'the peritoneal cavity about 2 in.
above and to the right of the umbilicus, travelling
towards the left iliac fossa. He was.admitted into
Vryheid Hospital (October.22nd, 1901), and was then
-
suffering from.localized.peritonitis in the neigh¬
bourhood of the abdominal.wound-namelytenderness,
slight abdominal distension, rigidity of right rectus
muscle, and a "rocky" pulse. ^Sweating cold extremi¬
ties, at this time . also ,•♦'he was very weak . and collpased.
In.about three days' time this peritonitis disappeared,
i
and the pain shifted to the region of the left iliac
fossa./
!
!
fossa. On October 27th the pain in the left iliac
fossa became very severeand.a fluctuating swelling
was now made out, situated:at the site of the pain,
I
slightly external to the left common femoral artery.
The.temperature now took on.a septic character, and
the patient was getting very weak.
Operation.- On October 28th, under an.anaesthe¬
tic, an incision was.made into this swelling, exter¬
nal to the femoral. When the fluctuating area was
i
| reached a large.quantity of stinking pus gushed out.
This was followed by an alarming rush of arterial
blood. A large suppurating.aneurysmal sac was dis¬
closed, and the common femoral was at once tied.
I
After the operation the patient was very collapsed,
and his life was despaired of for. some time. He
made.a good rally, however, but gangrene of the foot
/
shortly.afterwards set in.
Second Operation.- This gangrene slowly advanced
up the leg, and on November 29th, 1901, he was again
put under an anaesthetic, and his leg was disarticu-
| lated at the knee-.joint. The patella, was retained.
| After this operation his condition.was:again critical
for some time, and again he called on his reserve
energy, and made a good rally. The flaps of this
amputation/
. - • , ■ - ~ ■ - . " - - - -
amputation now sloughed, and.left the lower end of
the femur quite hare. Several weeks after this he
was transferred to No. 15 General Hospital, Howick
(owing to the Vryheid Hospital having been closed),
and he was admitted under my care in the surgical
.ward. He was then very anaemic and emaciated. He
had slight emphysema of the lungs.and had frequent
attacks of asthmatic bronchitis, the asthma at times
being very severe. His heart and kidneys were
healthy. The healed scars of the bullet wounds were
present as described above, and also the linear
cicatrix over the femoral artery. The left thigh
muscles were flabby and wasted. The lower end of
the left femur was projecting for about.II in.
beyond a ring of skin and cicatricial tissue. The
cartilage was eroded in places, and covered with
fungoid granulation tissue.at others. Obviously
the limb required amputating higher up.in order to
give him a good stump. As the patient was in such
an enfeebled condition, we determined.to delay.the
operation till he was stronger. He was accordingly
put on a liberal diet of roast chicken, and vegetab¬
les, fish, eggs, rice, port wine, etc., was given
respiratory stimulants, and carried out in. his bed
for /
for two or three hours on fine afternoons into the
sunshine in order that the bracing air of Howick
should have an opportunity to work good. under
this treatment his strength rapidly increased, his
anaemia disappeared, and the crepitant rales in his
chest became a thing of the past.
Third Operation.- On.February 24th, 1902, four
weeks after admission to Howick, under an anaesthetic
(chloroform), I amputated his thigh in the lower fourt
making anterior and posterior flaps, with circular
division of the muscles at the base. There was
scarcely any haemorrhage during the operation.
The nopliteal artery was very much smaller than
normal - it was about as large as the temporal artery
-
but was quite full of blood. Only two vessels
required ligature: torsion stopped the bleeding
from the others. The flaps had a very good vascular
supply. The after result was perfectly satisfactory
Everything healed by primary union, and the stitches
were removed on the ninth day. The cicatrix is now
well posterior, and the bone is covered with firm
healthy tissues. I should have mentioned that the
bullet has never yet been discovered. The patient
is now in good condition, but still has occasional
attacks/
•h
attacks of asthma. The artificial limb can be
affixed with comfort later on.
This case affords a good contrast to the former
i
I
case. In the former the left common iliac artery
was tied and the patient recovered with a sound
limb. In this case, a smaller artery, the Common
i
I
Femoral - was tied and the result was gangrene of the
foot, snreading upwards and necessitating an amputa-
!
tion at the knee and later on an amputation.above
I
this. On admission to Vryheid Hospital he was
suffering (vide notes) from "localized peritonitis
in the neighbourhood of the abdominal wound,"
The bullet therefore evidently travelled for
-
!
part of its course in the peritoneal cavity. It
I
may have injured the small intestine or it may not.
i
* !
At all events, the injury could not have been a
|
severe one. Had the coats of the small intestine
been completely ruptured, the man:almost certainly
would have developed generalised peritonitis and
would have probably died. A great deal has been
written about the wonderful recoveries from perforat¬
ing wounds of the small intestine without a laparo¬
tomy having been performed. If such cases were
recoveries from perforating wounds then indeed they
are/
are wonderful. But has the diagnosis:always been
reliable? Has not a localized peritonitis resulting
from an in.jury to the parietal peritoneum, or an
injury, short of comolete rupture of the coats of the j
small intest ine7 been often diagnosed as. a localized
peritonitis resulting from a perforation of the
small bowel. Differential diagnosis of abdominal
wounds was an extremely difficult and doubtful
matter.
4
in this regard the words of Mr. Makins in
"Surgical Experiences in South Africa" chapter XI
are striking. He says, "Although therefore I am
not prepared to deny the:possibility of spontaneous
recovery from an injury to the small intestine
I believe that in the immense majority
of cases in which a bullet crossed the small.intes¬
tine area without the supervention of serious symp-
!
toms, the small intestine escaped perforating injury."
Again later on he says, "in all the 5 cases (of
perforation of small intestine) in which the injury
was certainly diagnosed in hospital, death occurred."
In the case under discussion therefore I think j
i
.
it safe to assume that a perforation if the small
intestine did not occur as the bullet travelled
towards the left Iliac Fossa.

Enteric Fever simulating, in its Onset, Acute
Appendicitis.
/
Pte. R. Array Service Corps, was admitted to No.
15 General Hospital, Natal, on 26th Feby. '02 as a
"Convalescent from Malaria" contracted while on
"trek" on the Zululand border. He was Placed, in the
usual Convalescent Malarial Ward, given a liberal
diet, port wine and tonics. His attack of Malaria
had evidently been a very sharp one, for, on admis¬
sion he was very weak and anaemic and markedly
.jaundiced. Up to 10th March he improved greatly.
His temperature while in Hospital up to this date
was normal. On the night of 10th March he woke up
from sleen complaining of intense pain in his right
Iliac fossa. Vomited several times. Had a Rigor.
o
Temperature was then 105 . Shortly afterwards he
became extremely collapsed, and extremities were
quite cold. Hot bottles were Placed round him.
Strychnine given hypoderraically and sips of warm
water and brandy given by mouth. His general con¬
dition shortly after this improved, but he had fre¬
quent retching.and still complained of the severe
pain over Right IIiac.Region. The orderly Medical
Officer who was called to see him during the night,
in/
in his notes, stated:that the pain was referred to
MeBurney's Point. A hot fomentation was applied
over the painful area and this gave relief.
Next morning I was called to see the case in
consultation with 2 other medical officers. The
Q
patient's temperature.was then 103 F. Pulse 100
volume and tension good. Respirations 22 per minute.
He lay on his hack.with his right leg drawn up.
Still complained of.pain in Right Iliac Fossa. On
gently palpating this.area the man cried out with
pain. Tenderness over McBurney's Point, was extreme.
Skin was oedematous over this area. One felt dis¬
inclined to palpate the area thoroughly. Rectal
examination was negative. ' He. had been constipated
for 2 days. Tongue furred. Breath foul. Urine
normal. Liver area nob tender. IIe all felt per¬
fectly. agreed on the p.oint that the case was one of
Acute Appendicitis, and in view of the possibility of
an operation being required, the man was handed over
to me.
Progress of the Case:- He was given an oil
enema with.a good result. An icebag was placed
over the Right Iliac Fossa and milk and barley water
given by the mouth. Temperature rose this night to
104/
104. Tepid sponging reduced this to 102 . Pulse
volume and tension good.
o
12th March. Temperature.103 . Pulse.120.
Marked fulness.present over right fossa and rigidity
of abdominal wall over this area. Still tender
over.McBurney's Point. Tongue furred. Patient
looks very ill, and lies curled.up in bed.
13th March. Still fulness.in right side and
oedema of skin between Umbilicus and Anterior
Superior Iliac Spine of Right side. Boggy fluc¬
tuating area present. Textures still resistant.
Temperature down. Patient does not complain so
much of pain in this region.
The history after this briefly was as follows.
On loth March diarrhoea developed. The motions
were foul smelling and of the pea soup variety.
The pain in the Right Iliac Fossa had practically
disappeared but a marked resistant area could be
palpated, and the skin was still oederaatous over
the area. On the 13th a typical Typhoid Fever rash
developed.
Two days afterwards t left Natal and so was
unable to follow the progress of the case. The
doctor who had charge of the case after this wrote
me/
me in May saying that the case had run an ordinary
Enteric Fever course, with the execution of a slight
relapse,, and ^the man had been invalided to England for
a change.
From a surgical point of view this case is very
interesting. All who saw the case on the 11th March
j
felt quite positive about the accuracy of the diag¬
nosis, viz. Acute Appendicitis. The sudden onset
o
with vomiting and a temperature of 105 . (with no
| renal or hepatic mischief indicated) the rigidity of
the abdominal wall, oedema of skin and the localized
pain and tenderness over McBurney's Point, did not at
all lead one to suspect Enteric Fever. Most.probab¬
ly the Mesenteric Glands round the CoEcum and appendix
were acutely inflamed, and the mucous membrane here
itself.may have been early implicated.
The danger of a case such as this is that one
might be tempted to operate on the appendix.
Osier in his article on Typhoid Fever in his
"Principles and Practice of Medicine" says, "Operation
for Appendicitis has been performed in the early stage
of.Typhoid Fever owing to the combination of pain in
the Right Iliac Fossa, fever and constipation. This
has/
has happened twice at the Johns Hopkins Hospital."
-
Appendicitis. Removal of Appendix.
Private' R., Post Office Corps, admitted to No.
15 General Hospital, Howick early in January with a
•
Fistula in Ano which has been operated upon three
weeks previously. On admission his temperature was
normal, and his general condition good. He however
complained of rain over the site of the operation on
defaecation and after walking for any length of
time. On examination,the cicatrix of the operation
on the Right side of anus was.seen. At one part the
cicatrix looked gelatinous and unhealthy, and on
.
making a rectal examination, fluctuation above this
was elicited. Evidently, some pus had collected
behind the cicatrix. Under Cocaine locally applied
the gelatinous looking area was slit freely open with
a curved bistoury. At once about a drachm of pus
welled out. The cavity, which was small, was scraped
with a small Valkmanps spoon, the walls were swabbed
with pure carbolic and an antiseptic dressing applied.}
The cavity healed rapidly from the bottom, and the
man was then put on "light Hospital duty" in the
wards. The Fistula never gave him any more trouble.
Previous/
Previous Ilnesses:- Enteric Fever 9 months previously
in South Africa.
On Feby. 15th after having had dinner he was
siezed with a violent pain in the Right Iliac Fossa.
Vomited three times and was slightly collapsed. He
was at once put to bed, and the region of pain examin¬
ed. He had intense pain below and to the right of
the Umbilicus, and a hard resistant lump could be
easily felt here. The lump felt very much like a
stercoral mass. Skin over area not oedematous. The
slightest touch made the patient wince. Rectal ex¬
amination negative. Urine negative. No tenderness
or enlargement of liver. Other viscera healthy.
Temperature 102. Pulse 90. Volume and tension
good. An icebag was put over the Rieht Iliac Fossa,
and an oil enema administered. During the night he
was restless but said that the icebag was very sootho
ing. Temperature still 102 . Towards early morning
he vomited twice. The vomited matter was bile stained.
No blood in it. During the next few days the pain
persisted as an ache or "uneasy sensation" in the
right Iliac region, the1- temperature ranged between
o o
101 and 102 - slight evening rise - and the hard
resistant mass still persisted in the same situation.
This/
This mass was about the size of a small orange. It
was slightly tender on palpation. The fingers could
be dipped between it and the umbilicus but not between
it and the iliac crest. During this time he was
kent on milkiand enemas were occasionally given, with
very poor results.
On the 4th day after the acute attack the tempera
ture fell to normal. The pain and uneasiness had
quite disappeared and the patient asked for more
solid food. This was not allowed. The fulness in
-the right iliac fossa was still present, and if any¬
thing a little larger than before. Palpation did
not now cause any pain.
Two days afterwards a teaspoonful of Castor oil
was given. This was repeated two hourly till four
teaspoonfuls had been given. The patient passed a
normal motion as a result. Next morning the lump
could scarcely be felt. The tissues here however
felt thickened and resistant. Beef tea and thin
soup were then added to the dietary. Belladonna
Extract was given internally.
On Feby. 23rd the lump was again present in the
right iliac fossa, but was not so large as before,
no pain or tenderness and temperature normal.
A/
A consultation was now held on the case, and an
operation was recommended.
The diagnosis seemed to point to some cicatricial
band martially occluding the gvt at this Place. It
was also suggested that the lump felt might be a
localised abscess round the appendix which had dis¬
charged its contents into the lumen of the bowel,
and then had again reaccumulated. Against this was
the absence of pus in the stools, which had all
through been carefully examined.
On Feby. 25th the swelling was still present,
but not so large as before, between the umbilicus and
the left anterior superior iliac snine. The patient
was accordingly prepared for operation.
Under Chloroform next day, I cut down over the
appendix by a curved incision between the umbilicus
and the spine of the ilium, dividing the various
muscular layers and the peritoneum. No adhesions
were found between the parietal peritoneum and bowel.
irhe-n
The coecum and appendix were;shut off from the
general peritoneal cavity by sterile gauze. The
appendix was found lying behind the ascending colon,
and curved and twisted upon itself in a very marked
manner. The tip of the appendix was firmly adherent
to/
to the base and strong dense adhesions bound all to
the large bowel. One strong band ran transversely
across, behind the large bowel. This was divided
between two ligatures. After considerable trouble
and separating with a blunt dissector the appendix
was freed from its dense adhesions. These adhesions
bled freely during the operation. A cuff of peri¬
toneum and muscular tissue was then turned down from
the appendix to its base, and the appendix ligatured
and removed. The stump was then touched with a
point of pure carbolic and the cuff then stitched
over it. The free oozing from the torn adhesions
was stopped by gauze pressure applied for a little
time. The peritoneum, muscle and fascial layers
and skin were then united separately and a collodion
dressing applied.
The patient made an uninterrupted recovery,'the
incisions healing by pi^mary union.
,
The lumen of the appendix which was removed was
'
>
1
occluded about the middle of the organ. A small
ulcer was present near the base, the tissue over this
ulcer was very thin.
The adhesions did not appear to offer any marked
obstruction to the lumen of the bowel. Perhaps the
adhesions/
adhesions and dense matting of parts had caused a
local stasis or atony of the bowel walls at this place,
j and in consequence the intestinal contents were delayed
I
i and retarded in their nassage. The ulcer present in
; the appendix may have been a stercoral ulcer or it may j
j
have been a tuberculous ulcer.
I
i
The man had no signs of tubercular disease any¬
where else, unless one should look upon the Fistula
Atvo
in a^d els tubercular.
At one period during the case the possibility of
a connection between the appendicular swelling and the
fistula was considered, but nothing was found to
establish a connection between the two. Rectal
examinations always proved negative, and the operation
dispelled the. idea.
The curious point about the case i-s that the man
never remembers having at any time previously had
appendicitis, or trouble in the Right Iliac Fossa.
The attack of Enteric Fever which he had 9 months pre¬
viously may however have caused the matting' and adhesions in the Right Iliac Fossa.
I
dupAr iT 2o •n 73
M 7S" •it 27 2-7 ho
C 4-i*
F 106*
ias*
I03"
39!
102
38'-/.. /loo*
*
*
rfN
Ni
\
i
4,
M-
=«fc- >«==»5
98*
36° ST.*
1
„
,
M Pulse. E I OS 10
b <JI q° Ta 5?t ITl
M
Resp
^
Motions.
Urine,ozs.
Sp. 6r.
Reaction.
Chlorides.
Albumen.
Day ofDis.
aj 3
n>
C£ £
S"
Suppurative Prepatellar Bursitis.
Pte„ Moss. 1st Welsh.
This man was admitted to Hospital on 18th Septr
'02 complaining of "swollen right knee"
. o
On admission his temperature was 102 4 J?.
Pulse 108. He was flushed in the face and complain
ed of severe pain in the Right Knee .joint on making
the slightest movement. Four days previously he
stated that he fell on his right knee and "tore the
skin."
The Right Knee .joint was- markedly swollen.
On the most careful palpation the patient winced.
Over the lower end of the Patella was a dirty.look¬
ing scar covered with a bloody crust. The effusion
into the knee joint extended up into the
bursa under the lower.part of the Quadriceps
Extensor and the Patella itself was surrounded.by
erythematous looking tissue. The direct Inguinal
Glands were tender on palpation but not enlarged.
I cleaned the whole.area of the knee.with
turpentine and Carbolic lotion (1-20) and then
removed the dirty crust previously mentioned. At
once a rush of pus and serum took place. I was
not at the time sure whether this came from the
knee/
knee joint itself or from the Patellar Bursa.and I
I
did not wish then, while the parts were so evidently
sertic, to probe the area. I therefore only pared
the edges of the wound where they looked sloughy and
ordered fomentations of Liq. Hydrarg Perchler (1-1000)
2 hourly and fixed the knee on a back splint and laid
it elevated on a pillow. Calomel grs.vgiven 19:10.
'/
Temperature 101 Pulse 106. Feels feverish. Kept
on milk and chicken tea. The Joint is as swollen as
before and the pus is flowing freely.
Fomentations still applied as before. In the
evening I probed the area, because if the pus were
coming from the joint cavity I determined to freely
drain this by lateral incisions into it. The
probe however did not enter the joint and was evident¬
ly in a large bursal cavity only. The bursa in this
case was exceptionally large and its walls felt rough
and irregular to the point of the probe. It bled a
little on withdrawing the probe. I then put one
blade of a scissors into the opening and passed it up
for an inch and then cut the intervening tissue.
This established a free drain to the bursa.
Fomentations 4 hourly.
20 th/
20th. Temperature 100. Pulse 91. Effusion
in Knee /joint still same. Still painful on slightest
movement. Bursa draining freely hut not so much pus
as before, more serum now. Inguinal Glands no longer
tender.
25rd. Temperature 98'6. Pulse 80. Effusion
in knee joint going down. Has very little pain.
Discharge from bursa now only clear serum. On con¬
valescent diet.
25th. Temperature 98*3. Pulse 81. Effusion
in knee almost gone. No discharge from bursa,
wound granulating. Backsplint removed.
28th. Flexing and extending the joint to preA
vent stiffness. Wound practically closed. No
joint effusion.
30th. Up and walking about with aid of a stick.
This case was clearly a Suppurative Prepatellar
i
i Bursitis. — Infected probably from the fall which he
had.— The chief interest lies in the fact of the
large amount of pus which collected. This bursa was
much larger than normal probably owing to the pus
pushing aside the walls after being dammed back by
the crust forming over the wound. The great effusion
in/
in the Knee joint is also interesting. It did not
develop until the 3rd or 4th day after the fall,
therefore it apparently was not caused by any twist
I
i
| given to the knee when the man fell. I should have
mentioned that when the man was admitted the knee
had assumed the usual position of greatest ease in
effusion.- viz. flexion of the leg on thigh and limb
lying on its outer aspect.
Three Cases of Fibromata:
Case I.:
Private Moore, admitted to No.7 General
Hospital, Pretoria on 15th October 1902, with "two
lumps on his thigh" according to his own statement.
These lumps complained of were situated, one
over either great trochanter of the femur. They
were about the size of a large Brazil nut. The
skin was fairly movable over the tumours and they
could be moved laterally on the subjacent textures.
Edges faded away imperceptibly with the subcutaneous
fatty tissue. Were not painful on manipulation.
Skin over them a little indurated and erythematous.
The man complained of them troubling him when he lay
on one or other side for any length of time. These
lumps were first noticed by the patient eight months
previously while on trek.
He also had a very small nodule over the spine
of the third piece of the sacrum. It had the same
characteristics as the other two.
Under chloroform nodules were dissected out.
They proved to be fibromata - simply hard masses
of dense fibrous tissue.
Case II.:
This man was admitted with several small hard
lumps over the left great trochanter, both olecranon^,
and/
and spines of the sacrum. Had stated that he not¬
iced them 18 months before admission.
Under chloroform two small fibromata about
the size of "flattened" marbles were removed from
over the great trochanter. Four very small ones
were removed from the olecranon processes, and one
from the sacrum.
Case ill.:
A fibroma was dissected from over the right
trochanter and the head of the right 'fibula. These
partook of the same characteristics as the two for¬
mer.
For notes on these two last cases, I am indebt¬
ed to Major Holt, R.A.M.C., under whose care they
were. The first case was my own.
The only surgical interest in these cases is
their causation. Why did they develop over pro¬
minent bony surfaces? Major Holt told me that he
personally had seen three other such cases in
South Africa and had heard of more from other med¬
ical officers. I myself saw one other in a pa¬
tient who was in hospital for another condition.
This man had fibromata on both trochanters and over
the right malleolus, but they were very small.
In fact they felt very much like rheumatic nodules.
He told me that other men in his regiment also had
them.
The/
The most generally accepted theory as to their
causation is that they occur en bohy surfaces ex¬
posed to pressure when a man is lying on hard ground.
When a soldier, wrapped in his blanket, lies asleep
on his side on the hard sun-baked ground, his tro¬
chanter is pressed upon. If he lies on his back
his sacrum is exposed to pressure. By pursuing this
theory a little further one can imagine that the ole¬
cranon or malleoli will in certain positions be also
exposed to pressure. This "intermittent irritation"I
following a general axiom in surgery, will bring abou*:
hypertrophy" The fibrous tissue hypertrophies in
order to form a pad of protection to the prominent
bony probesss All the cases described occurred in
ic
soldiers who had done a lot of treking and sleeping
out on the veldt.
Loose body in Left Knee Joint. Removal.
Tpr.Pain, of Steinacker's Horse, age 43. On 28th
May 1902 while riding on the veldt in the Eastern
Transvaal on scouting duty his horse put his fore- j
leg into the hole of an ant bear, stumbled and
fell, bringing him to the ground. His left foot
got caught between the horse and the ground and
his left knee was twisted. He managed to mount
again and ride back to camp. That evening his
knee was very swollen and painful. He was put at
rest in bed for ten days. The swelling had then
disappeared and he attempted to walk about. After
walking about a little he felt his left knee "give
way suddenly"and he fell to the ground. That eve¬
ning synovitis of the knee again occurred. The
Synovitis disappeared in a day or two and the
«
patient again got up and walked about. Three days
afterwards "his knee again gave way" and effusion
again took place into the joint. This train of
events went on for about two months,"periods of
apparent stability in the limb and then a sudden
"give way".— The patient at this time himself
felt a small loose nodule on the outer side of his
left knee cap. He could move this body about to
a limited extent,
in/
2.
In September the man came under my care in
Pretoria, bringing with him the above history. He
was an intelligent man and at once directed me to
the site of the loose body in the joint. This body
could be easily felt. It could be moved up and down
on the outer side of the patella and generally lay,
when the patient was in bed, to the upper and outer
quadrant of the patella. By flexing and extending
the leg and pressing on the body it could be made to
disappear from its usual site.
On 19th September therefore, under an anaesthe¬
tic, the knee having been previously prepared for
operation in the usual way, a curved incision was
made from the inner margin of the ligamentum patellae
to the posterior part of the internal condyle of the
femur, concavity of the incision being upwards. The
flap of skin and subcutaneous tissue was then dissec¬
ted upwards. The inner part of the capsule of the
joint was then opened with a sharp knife and the
finger inserted and worked up into the pouch on the
outer side of the patella. The body could just be
felt. Aided by external manipulation with the other
-
hand, it was brought wPll within reach, caught with
a Vulsellum forceps and extracted. A search was
then made for any other foreign body. None other
was found. The capsule was then closely stitched
with/
u ■H <3 7i- *4
*
A r?
i 2-
3 <T
< ■7 Name C Disease
C 41--F 106*
105*
40?--101-'
•I03* : 1
/
i:
\
f jo
IOI*
38!
IOO'
37!._.9Sf
98*
36
A
*
/
>
r
>
'
*
A
* i#
"71
' ji
f
*
A
^t_>
/lye Result
„
,
M Pulse. EM
Peso.
—
E
Motions.
Urine, ozs.
Sp. Gr.
Reaction
Chlorides.
Albumen.
Day ofDis.
with fine catgut and the skin incisions "brought
together with silkworm gut. Limb was fixed on to a
a back splint.
The case made an uninterrupted recovery. Silk
worm gut stitches were removed on the 8th day, and
back splint removed on the 9th day.
On the 11th day the patient was up on crutches
and told to gently swing the leg at intervals.
Passive movements were regularly carried out after
this.
Twenty six days after the operation he was dis¬
charged for duty. He could then use his limb freely
in every way, and had no more attacks of "giving way"
of the joint or of effusion.
Remarks: In this case I might have simplified
the operation considerably by cutting down directly
over the loose body. I wished to make sure, however,
that the joint did not contain any more loose bodies
and to make a full exploration of the joint the
inner incision seems to give greater room. The
body removed was about the size of a halved bean,
and felt fibro-elastic in texture.
Dislocated Semilunar Cartilage, Right Knee Joint.
Private Scott, R.A.M.C., age 23.
This man was an orderly doing duty in a Hospital
marquee containing two patients who were prisoners
for breach of Hospital discipline. During the night
one of the prisoners attempted to rush out of the
marquee. ,Scott put out his right foot to trip the
runaway and the man fell heavily upon the outer side
of Scott's leg. Scott fell add states that he"felt
something give" in his knee joint. He shortly after
wards was brought to me complaining of pain and swel¬
ling in the knee joint and inability to walk. He
had then very marked effusion into the joint and was
evidently in great pain.
He was put to bed. Back splint applied to the
knee joint and lead and opium fomentations applied.
Next day, 17th September, 1902, the effusion
was as marked as before, but the pain was less.
On 24th September the effusion had disappeared
and the limb could be flexed and extended easily
while the patient lay in bed.
He was allowed up on the 25th and on the 26th
walked about with a stick. In the afternoon he was
walking about the ward without the aid of a stick
when he suddenly felt his right knee give way. He
got/
got into bed and examined the knee himself and was
positive that he felt a small hard body on the inner
side of his knee-cap. On careful examination of
the knee next morning I could feel nothing, so order¬
ed him to walk about the ward and bend his knee free¬
ly. This he did, and in a quarter of an hour told
me that he could again feel the body. I examined
the knee this time while the man stood up and could
distinctly feel a hard, resistant pea-like body to
the inner side of the patella and lying at the art¬
icular junction of the femur and tibia.
Major Holt, R.A.M.C., coming into the ward at
this juncture, also felt this body and suggested
either a dislocated semilunar cartilage or a loose
body. The site was marked with a pencil of silver
nitrate and the patient put to bed. He again had
effusion into the joint.
The knee was prepared for operation and on 3rd
October under chloroform a curved incision was made
as in the previous case (Tpr.Pain's). On incising
the capsule of the joint a considerable flow of syno-'
vial fluid took place. The internal semilunar
cartilage was found to be broken right across close
to its anterior horn and the coronary ligament at this
place was ruptured. The whole internal semilunar
cartilage was then removed with a fine curved blunt
scissors. Considerable difficulty was met with in
freely/
freely separating the posterior part of the cartil¬
age through the small incision made in the capsule.
The knee joint, in view of the great handling of
t&e parts during the operation, was then douched out
with weak antiseptic lotion (see note at end of case)
The capsule was stitched with fine catgut and the
I
skin surfaces with silkworm gut. No drainage em¬
ployed. Cyanide dressings were then applied and
large pads of wool with "bandage over all to keep up
elastic pressure. Limb laid on a short "back splint
and elevated on a pillow.
The attached temperature chart shows that the
temperature was suspicious for some days after the
operation and the possibility of septic infection
suggested itself, especially as the patient complain¬
ed of pain and "fulness" in the joint. The case
was dressed on the third day after the operation in
order to ascertain the cause. Beyond a great deal
of effusion into the joint, everything looked per¬
fectly healthy.
Three silkworm gut stitches were removed and a
grooved probe worked into the joint. A little
clear serum escaped.
On the 9th day all the silkworm gut stitches
were removed. No sign of pus anywhere except the
high temperature. The patient otherwise felt very
well and stated that his knee gave him no trouble.
| On/
I

On the 21st he was allowed up on a wheeled chai-r
and next day passive movements of the joint were car¬
ried out. This was continued till the 26th when IE
left Pretoria.
I cannot satisfactorily account for this temper¬
ature. At the time of operation when douching the
joint I thought that SE was using warm sterile lotion,
but the orderly had given me warm 1-40 carbolic
lotion instead. Perhaps this may have set up irrit¬
ation and consequent effusion into the joint. The
patient also suffered often from mild attacks of mal¬
aria. Perhaps this may have had something to do
with the temperature. He was given gr.v. tabloids
of Quinine three times daily for a few days.
I do not anticipate any stiffness in this joint,
as the movements were very free on the 26th, when I
last saw the case.
^f5 7 - —
'7vtu4rV-J-<3j .•■•'••
3L^
'nrrSe1"-<"/a,i
*u^£ 4TL
=
/-W^ «M~r^ds Jfa~ L^ArJrr^ CU^U -V-

*
♦
Lateral Dislocation Rip;ht Knee joint and Sciatic
Dislocation of Hip of same side.
Lieut. Lindley, 7 th Hussars: Admitted 23rd Sept em-;
her 1902, into No. 7 General Hospital, Pretoria.'
This case is interesting on account of the unusual
injury. A dislocation of the Hip is a comparat¬
ively rare event in surgery. A lateral disloca¬
tion of the knee is also rare. A combination of
the two injuries in the same limb is extremely un¬
common .
This officer, while riding in a steeplechase
at Pretoria, came to grief over a stone wall.
Horse and rider fell, the horse rolling over the
rider. The rider managed to disengage himself
from the stirrups, but was unable to get up.
On admission there was tremendous effusion
into the Right Knee joint. The right leg did
not lie in its normal axis with the thigh. The
thigh was inverted and rotated inwards, and the leg
was directed towards the middle line. The inner
side of thigh and leg formed a marked concavity
towards the middle line of body. The Officer
was in great pain, so a careful examination was
delayed for two hours. He was then put under an
anaesthetic and a Sciatic dislocation of the Hip
was discovered. The trochanter was well above
Nelaton's/
Nelaton's line. The fingers could be "dipped in"
above the Trochanter. Tensor Fascia Feraoris was
relaxed. Shortening Ig- inches. The Head of
Femur could be felt lying over Sciatic notch. A
skiagram was taken of the Hip and Knee joint be¬
fore the Officer was anaesthetised and by the time
he was fully under, the negative was developed.
The picture of the Hip was a poor one and no land¬
marks could be made out. The Knee showed a
lateral dislocation (See Skiagram attached). The
swelling and effusion in the Knee joint was so ex¬
treme that one could barely make anything out with
certainty, by touch and manipulation.
Reduction of the Head of the Femur was attemp¬
ted in the ordinary way. On the first attempt,
the head was reduced int.o the Thyroid Foramen. On
the second attempt, this again occurred. A loop
of strong flannel was then passed round the upper
part of the thigh and an assistant directed to
pull outwards. On flexion, extension and rotation
outwards being now attempted, the head of the bone
went into the Acetabulum with an obvious click.
The limb was now put on M'Ewen's long thigh splint
/
with back rest and external supports. Extension
of 14 lbs. vrns applied and the limb and bed eleva¬
ted. An ice bag was applied over the Knee Joint.
The/
The Internal Condyle of the Femur in the
first Skiagram looks unusually prominent and the
external looks unusually small. This appearance
is due, I think, to the fact that the outer con¬
dyle is not only displaced outwards, hut that it
is also rotated forwards on the Tihia, while the
Internal Condyle is rotated backwards. This rota
tion was probably due to the dislocation of the
Hip. In the second Skiagram, taken after the
hip was reduced and before any manipulations had
been applied to the Knee joint, the unusual dis¬
parity and distortion of the condyles is not seen.
Suppurative Necrosis left ankle Joint. Operation
Death.
Quarter-master Sgt. Clarke, Royal Garrison Artill¬
ery admitted to No. 7 General Hospital, Pretoria
on 18th October 1902, with the following History.
Seven weeks previous to admission he jumped from
a Cape cart in motion and sustained a Compound
fracture of the lower end of his left Tibia and
Fibula. He was treated in the South African Con¬
stabulary Hospital during these seven weeks. No
temperature chart was kept. The medical officer
in charge of the case stated that when the man
came under his care "the lower end of the left
Tibia/
Tibia was protruding through the skin on the inner
side of the ankle and that the tip of the malleolus
was broken off and lying external, i.e., on the
Pibular side of the projecting lower end of the
Tibia. The wound was dressed and the leg put on
a back splint and foot piece. This was all the;
history obtainable. The case, up to this time,
.
had obviously not been skilfully treated.
On admission, the left ankle joint was tremen¬
dously swollen and acutely painful on making the
slightest examination. The foot was swollen and
oedematous. There was a sinus on the inner side
of the ankle joint covered with pus and unhealthy
granulations and discharging pus and gritty par¬
ticles of bony debris.
This sinus was dilated with dressing forceps
and a drainage tube inserted. The joint cavity
was then syringed out with 1-1000 Corrosive Sublim¬
ate lotion followed by Peroxide of Hydrogen. Foot
bandaged and leg put on a Macintire's splint.
Bare bone could be felt by probing this sinus.
One could move the foot on the leg laterally and
so elicit a distinct bony grating sensation.
The temperature (See Chart) for the next few
days indicated the presence of pus. The drainage
certainly/
CpJr it 14 V) 0/ XX XI 74- 7-S"
c 4-1.'. f 106*
105'
•
i.
ios*
39!..
102.
ioi*
38!
too'
\
/ V I
r
) pU \
r>rl r
D
1
J
\i \?
\
•
98*
36
„ , m Pufse.
e
-
m
Peso.
E
Motions. 1 0 if 0 1 / 0
Urine,ozs.
Sp. Gr.
Reaction.
Chlorides.
Albumen.
Day ofDis.
certainly at this stage was not efficient. The
ankle joint was "boggy and intensely oedematous.
Operation on 23rd under Chloroform. The
sinus was enlarged "by cutting upwards and downwards
and the granulations vigorously scraped away with
a Volkmann's spoon. At the "bottom of the sinus,
the Tibia was seen bared of periosteum in front and;
back. Parts of this bone were breaking down and
these parts were curetted. The ankle joint cavity
was full of dirty debris and pus and the astragalus
was lying with its upper articular cartilage quite
eroded. The greater part of the upper surface of
the astragalus was yellow and unhealthy. In fact,
it looked like, and was of the consistence of hard
yellow soap and was quite non-vascular. A vertic¬
al incision was then made over the lower end of the
Fibula down past the joint. The Fibula was found
to have been the seat of a fracture - the malleolus
was united at a very bad angle to the rest of the
shaft.
. The bone was therefore divided with a
-
mallet at the line of junction and the fragments
separated. At once a strong rush of pus took
place through this part. This was evidently an
abscess which had formed between the two bones from
a suppurative localised periostitis. The whole
was then flushed out with 1-1000 Corrosive lotion.
Two/
Two drainage tubes were inserted on the inner side,
one reaching up between the lower ends of the fibula
and tibia ana the other draining the ankle joint.
The incision on the outer side was closed up
except at the bottom, where a gauze drain was in¬
serted. The lower fragment of the fibula was
brought into good apposition with the shaft. The
*
wound was surrounded with gauze and wool, bandaged
and put on a Macintire's splint.
24th October:
passed a good night,
25th October:
Wound dressed: draining well:
Pulse regular, 81.
Brandy - 1 oz.
Spr;Ammon.
Aromat. -
ioz.
10 a.m., Dressed. Condition as above.
2 p.m., Patient says he feels "queer". Looks
very jaundiced. Pulse 99, slightly inter¬
mittent. Volume and tension low. Complains
of cold hands and feet although the day is
extremely hot.
10 p.m. Showing signs of collapse. Given strychnine
and ether hypodermically. Brandy by mouth.
Rectal injection of warm saline. Hot foment¬
ations over precordia. Pulse intermittent,
volume very poor, tends to become "thready".
Eyes look oedematous and heavy.
5 a.m., Died.
Post Mortem; Rigidity marked. Hypostasis
slight.
Heart: Extreme fatty infiltration of walls.
Cardiac muscle feels soft and diffluent.
Along the sulci great masses of fat are pre¬
sent. The muscle is extremely pale. In
auricles and ventricles ante-and post-mortem
clots present. Valves healthy.
Pericardium/
Pericardium; Covered on the outer side with flakes
of yellow fat.
Endocardium; Pale yellow in appearance. Liver:--
enlarged. Patty degeneration.
Kidneys; Large, fatty.
Brain; Normal. No signs of calcareous degeneration
of arteries present anywhere.
Remarks; The man therefore died from fatty
degeneration of the heart. Cardiac failure may
have been due to the shock of the operation aggra¬
vated by the unusually hot and stifling weather
which prevailed at the time. He, however, stood
the operation very well and gave no trouble to the
anaesthetist while under chloroform. The opera¬
tion lasted an hour and a half.
There is no doubt that the operation was nec¬
essary with such a marked swinging temperature and
foul condition of his ankle joint. His death was
a surprise and was not even remotely anticipated.
(SBfTT". ■ .
&*AstC6t* -f'o-^JAjr*+JtC -"^-A ^
i^A,JVV f**-*? *>K«j?>
^2<*JVo/C«r->V?
i\t^AJ-C£y^y hCfiS *7/^«-t*-fco f~£t/ ^ '
inVfcj OJbisziszJb . SCX*^etj xtrw-Y ^ (j~S<?Lo
b) &r>rJLcL/ ~hy ^6-r~ij-v^^A^ suSus/ir"
-CLc0^rs^JC &r£x*^ t~&*S \^^oj ^w-vy h&rxr^-j^i. /<L^
-Cor-v^^»
ay CLC^£^>; o^y\
~^1!~~ J 7^-^C^Tr-e^Azxr-L-eij
OPHTHALMIC NOTES.
Errors of Refraction and various pathological
conditions of the eyes were responsible for the
invaliding to England of a large number of soldiers
during the late war. The eye cases were sent to
Netley to be treated by experienced oculists.
The majority of the eye cases admitted to
Hospital were for Errors of Refraction. During
the war, a large number of men were hurriedly enlisted, and sent out to the front without having
had their sight carefully tested. This was espec¬
ially the case with some of the contingents of Im¬
perial Yeomanry. Conjunctivitis was very common
in some districts. Syphilitic Choroiditis, Kerat¬
itis, Iritis and Dacryo-cystitis, etc., were all
represented.
The following few histories taken from my
case book while in charge of the Eye ward in No. 7
General Hospital, Pretoria, are fairly representa¬
tive of the class of Eye practice furnished by sol¬
diers in the field.
. ■ " ■ .
Pterygium - Left Eye.
Pte. W,, at Pretoria, No. 7 General Hospital.
Admitted with a Pterygium growing over left eye.
It occupied the usual site, viz., inner canthus,
and was of the usual outline, base to nose, apex
on the cornea and with its neck on the corneal
margin. This Pterygium was very large and very
vascular, and the patient says that it had been
rapidly growing during the last 3 weeks, while in
Pretoria.
As it was so prominent an object on his eye
and as it was increasing in size, I determined to
remove it. Accordingly, on 30th September 1902,
under 5% Solution of Cocaine Hydrochlorate dropped
on to the conjunctiva 15 minutes before operation,
the growth was dissected off. The apex was re¬
moved clearly and then by pulling forward the re¬
mainder of the growth with a fine pair of forceps,
one quite easily slipped a fine Graefe's Knife
under it towards the base, completing this stage
by removing the knife and making two convergent
incisions to the base. The conjunctiva was then
freed from the sclerotic above and below, to a
slight extent, and the 2 rawed edges brought to¬
gether as far as the Corneo-Scleral margin by 3
fine horse hair stitches. The area left bare
over the cornea itself was not interfered with.
The eye was then douched with Boric Lotion and a
light/
light wool compress applied. It was douched at
the end of 24 hours, and on the second day the pad
was removed and dark glass substituted, the patient
being kept in the tent and not allowed outside.
Stitches removed on third day.
On 29th October, 1902, the patient was dis¬
charged for duty with his regiment. At this time,
there was a linear pucker in the conjunctiva ex¬
tending along the line of the stitches. The area
over the Cornea originally occupied by the apex of
the Pterygium looked somewhat steamy and granular,
but showed no tendency to increased growth. Move¬
ments of eye normal. Refraction normal.
The cause of this condition, I consider to be,
the irritation from the dust and grit of the Trans¬
vaal Veldt. I have seen cases of Pterygium while
on active service in South Africa and in all cases,
could trace a history of irritation from dust. The
case in point illustrates a very definite history.
This man had been trekking with an infantry regi¬
ment in the Middelburg District in the Eastern
Transvaal. Middelburg and the surrounding country
is very dusty and the dust is very fine and very
hard. Added to this, it is one of the windiest
places in the Transvaal.
This/
This man says that towards the latter part of
the day his eyes gave him a lot of trouble. He
felt them to be hot and full of dust, and frequent¬
ly rubbed them with his dusty hands. At night, he
often had to lie do?/n on the sandy soli with nothing
between his head and the ground save a waterproof
oil sheet and a half turn of an army blanket. He
says that in the morning his eyes were often full
of sand grit. Add to all this, the scarcity of
water for washing purposes. I give this case of
Pterygium to illustrate the fact that it, as far
as my observation went, was the result of direct
irritation from dust. It occurs in healthy indiv¬
iduals. In none of the cases I saw could the
origin be traced to corneal ulcers or Phlyctenular
Conjunctivitis. Also this case was the only one
which was considered to require operative inter¬
ference. The other cases were left alone, merely
putting them in better surroundings and for the timej
making them wear dark glasses and bathe their eyes
thrice daily with a weak Boracic lotion. The
above case was progressive, vascular and very large,
hence the necessity for removal.
Bandmaster Sgt. B., 1st Welsh - Hypermetropia.
Admitted with ^Conjunctivitis and pain at the back
of/
of both eyes." Dimness on reading print. Print
quite blurred. Cannot see a target at 1,000 yds.,
and bull's-eye only at 200 yards. Small fissures
present at outer angle of Right Eye. He is a
Bandmaster and states that his chief difficulty is
that after conducting the Regimental band for a
few minutes, the music gets blurred and indistinct.
By Retinoscopy - Right Eye Left Eye.
+ i-s~D , H-ysp
£3 +I--JSO
A /
Vision - Left Eye 4 .
Right Eye 4 (f-l-oD - ^
This man was aged 41. The near point had receded,
and he had presbyopia. As this man was a most
important non-commissioned officer and as his
error was not marked, he was ordered glasses in
order to enable him to return to his duties with
the regiment. He also had a Fistula in Ano, which
was operated upon while he was in Hospital.
Pte. G., 1st Welsh, age 24. Hypermetropic Astig¬
matism.
Sight getting slightly worse during last few months!.
Has frequent headaches; marked photophobia. Dim¬
ness of vision on reading printed matter. Inter¬
nal Strabismus left eye.
Retinoscopy - Left Eye Right Eye.
4-5"'5~D
4-LfOD +%-bU
Discs healthy.
I might remark in passing here that with sol¬
diers, it is often quite useless to test their
vision with Snellen's types. They, if so inclined,
give most conflicting answers. For instance, this
man was extremely anxious to he invalided home to
England, as he was tired of active service. On
testing him with Snellen's types, I could see that
the man was lying to me, so depended entirely in
all my reports on the result of my examination by
Retinoscopy.
This man was invalided home to Netley to be
examined by a Medical Board.
NYSTAGMUS:
Pte. G. T., 2nd Northamptons, age 23. Admitted
with marked lateral and oblique nystagmus. Ver¬
tical nystagmus present but of slight degree.
Under atropine, by shadow test, the following was
found.
Right eye Left Eye
I 41 75"D |
--3-oD f -f-o-oD
His Knee jerks were present and equal. No exaggera-j
tiont Flexor response on tickling plantar sur¬
faces of feet. Superficial reflexes present and
unimpaired. No tremors of any sort. No history
of/
of Syphilis obtainable. *In fact, with the excep¬
tion of the Nystagmus and Refractive error, he was
apparently quite a healthy man. He had no coloboma of the choroid or microphthalmos, etc. to ac¬
count for the nystagmus, and no sign of dissemina¬
ted Sclerosis could be discovered. The patient
himself complained of the oscillations - unlike the
early congenital cases. He said that 12 months
previous to admission into Hospital, he felt the
condition coming on and that he is fully conscious
of the oscillations of his eyeballs. After look¬
ing fixedly at an object for any length of time,
he has to shut his eyes for fear of falling. At
a distance of 200 yards, he said that he could not
distinguish a man from a woman - only a blurred
-
figure presented itself. He often failed to
salute his officers when passing - not being able
to distinguish the difference in uniform. When
he attempts to do any reading now, his eyes begin
to water and he has to close them and relinquish
I
.
the attempt. During the three months immediately
previous to admission, his sight has got rapidly
worse, and he was afraid to go on duty as a sentry.
I think that the refractive error may have a great
deal to do with the nystagmus if his history given
is at all accurate. The refractive error, however,
is/
is not very marked. The nystagmus again may be
a first symptom of disseminated sclerosis, dissem¬
inated Sclerosis being one of the most difficult
of diseases to diagnose in its initial stages.
A Medical board was held on this case, and as it
was considered that he would be of little further
use as a soldier, he was recommended for discharge
from the service.
SIMPLE HYPERMETROPIA:
Lieutenant S., Royal Horse Artillery, aet. 28.
This officer consulted me regarding his sight on
6th September, 1902. He said that he never was
troubled with any difficulty in vision till a fort¬
night previously. He had worked his guns through
the greater part of the war, and on the conclusion
of pfe^ce, was camped with his battery in Pretoria.
He now began to read for an examination in Mathem¬
atics connected with promotion to a higher rank.
He worked at night mostly^ beside a small paraffin
lamp and a couple of lighted candles. After read¬
ing for about a quarter of an hour, he suffered
most intolerable pain at the back of his eyes.
The printed matter got blurred and his eyes watered
considerably (Accommodative Asthenopia). Then a
"splitting/
"splitting headache" came on and he had to go to
hed. As this happened for three successive nights,
he determined to rest for a fortnight. At the end
of a
fortnight, on again essaying to do his mathem¬
atical work, the same train of symptoms developed.
He became alarmed and consulted me. I found the
following condition present.
Right Eye (with Snellen's Types) Vision 4
( -f-i o D =
improvement
Left Eye V (j-l-jrD = Improvement.
The fundus was quite healthy and Retinoscopy showed
no astigmatism. I certainly expected to meet with
Astigmatism in this case, as the headaches and
other symptoms were so marked.
He was extremely anxious to go on with his
examination, so he was ordered the necessary lenses.
He procured them in Johannesburg and reported to
me 3 weeks later that he could now read without any
trouble whatever, and can sit for hours over his
work without any untoward symptom developing. I
should state that I examined this officer's urine
for albumen, but found none.
MUSGAE VOLITANTES:
Pte. Davey, Royal Artillery.
Complains of *'spots flickering in front of his
eyes during strong daylight".
While on "trek" in very hot and dusty parts,
he/
he stated that his eyes gave him considerable un¬
easiness owing to these specks always floating in
front of him. He stated that he was quite free
from them in the early morning after a night's
sleep, but when the sun got up and he started trek¬
king, the condition came on. There was no error
of refraction or opacities of the Vitreous to ac¬
count for the Muscae Volitantes. The discs were
quite healthy. No albumen in urine. The man was
very anaemic and debilitated and very nervous about
himself.
He was kept in the Hospital for a month, during
three weeks of which time he had to wear "London
Smoke" glasses during the day. Strychnine and
Iron were given internally, a liberal die~2F and a
bottle of Stout daily. When discharged from Hos¬
pital, the muscae had quite disappeared and he was
strong, robust and free from nervousness.
I heard from him a month after this, and he
was then quite well and had had no return of the
Muscae Volitantes.
The condition probably owed its origin to the
debility of the patient and the heat and fatigue of
serving day after day in a hot and dusty country
under a scorching sun.
DEEP ULCER OP THE CORNEA:
Private T., age 28, Gordon Highlanders, admitted
to No. 7 General Hospital, Pretoria, with pain in
frontal and temporal regions, photophobia and
purulent discharge from both eyes. This man
states that 5 days before admission he was on duty
in a very heavy dust storm and that the gritty
particles of sand so irritated his eyes that he
constantly had to rub them with his hands. Next
day, his "eyes were inflamed" and he could not
open them in strong sunlight. He was treated in
Camp for 3 days and then sent to Hospital. Over
the centre of the right Cornea was a deep purulent
ulcer. Cornea surrounding looked steamy and milky
Towards the outer part of the cornea of left eye,
was a smaller ulcer, purulent, but not very deep.
Both ulcers were circular in outline. The Con¬
junctiva of both eyes was markedly injected and
pus was everywhere abundant.
Progress and Treatment: Blisters applied to both
temples. Eyes douched gently every 2 hours with
warm weak corrosive sublimate lotion. Atropine
and Cocaine solution instilled twice daily. The
eyes were covered with warm Boracic fomentations.
Under this treatment, the purulent condition and
the/
the conjunctivitis rapidly cleared. The deep
ulcer on the right eye did not perforate. (it
looked at first, as if paracentesis of the anterior
chamber through the floor of the ulcer would be
necessary). On the 3rd day, a little Iodoform
ointment was applied to the lid margins. In two
weeks, the man was allowed up, wearing a pair of
dark glasses. The ulcers were then rapidly heal¬
ing. Photophobia was still slightly present. A
week after this, he was unvalided to England in a
Hospital ship.
Fracture. Base of Skull.
Brevet Ma j . V. On 22nd Sept. was playing polo.
His horse was sixteen hands high. During the game
the horse shied and reared and the rider was thrown
violently to the ground, striking the hard sun-baked
ground with his occiput. He was at once carried to
an ambulance and brought to Hospital. On the way
up to Hospital in the ainbulance he was "vomiting
blood, was restless and struggling purposelessly
with his arms and legs. Did not speak." These
were the notes that the doctor whotbrought him up
gave me.
On admission: There was a slight scalp
wound of left side which did not go down to the
bone. Still vomiting blood. Bleeding freely
from both right and left ears. No cerebro-spinal
fluid detected. No paralysis of limbs or face.
Does not talk or articulate at all. Bladder dis¬
tended. Urine drawn off with a catheter.^) No sub¬
conjunctival haemorrhage or proptosis. Pupils
equal, no contraction or dilatation. React to
light. Temperature 100°F. Pulse 78. Respira¬
tions 20 per minute. The ears were syringed out
and any lacerations of the walls of the canal or
meatus or membrane searched for. A view of the
membrane could not be obtained on account of the
free/
free oozing of blood. Corrosive wool was therefore
plugged in meatus. Patient kept lying on his back
with an icebag to his shaved head. Given vii. grs.
II
calomel If 12 p.m. Temperature 101.4 Pulse 52.
■I
Respirations 17. No sickness since 9 p.m. No
more bleeding from left ear. Restless. Changes
position from side to side about every quarter of an
hour. Once or twice lay on his back and drfew his
legs up. Frequently opens and closes eyes in a
rapid winking manner. Pulse at times irregular,
but the tension is getting better. Volume small.
Respiratory excursion good. The right ear still
oozes blood.
5.15 a.m.: Urine passed in bed. Temperature 101.2"
Pulse 54. Respirations 18.
6.45 a.m.: Vomited oz. vi. coffee coloured fluid
Twhich contained disintegrating blood). Lies
now more quietly. Has not spoken or groaned.
9 a.m.: Pulse 64. Respirations 20. Milk oz.i.
11 a.m.: Pulse 72. Respirations 23. Temperature
102.4°.
11.50 a.m.: Bowels acted freely. Passed urine un¬
consciously. No oozing from'right ear'since
10 a.m. He was given oz. iii. of milk at
this hour and seemed to swallow this fairly
well.
5 p.m.: Restless from 2 p.m. Pulse 73. Respirationd 23. Temperature 103®. Coughed at
intervals. Quiet.
6 p.m.: Milk, oz. ij. Brand's Essence dr.i.
Lifted both upper eyelids several times in
a curious manner. (Sister's note).
8.50 p.m./
8.50 p.m.: Urine passed in ted. Lies quietly.
Bo paralysis anywhere, "but a certain measure
of rigidity of the legs is present. No
abdominal distension.
10 p.m.; Pulse 58. Respirations 22. Temperature
101.4°.
11 p.m.: Right pupil larger than left. Does not
respond to light. Twitching of both upper
eyelids occasionally.
21st September:
1 a.m.: Temperature 106.6°. Pulse 76. Respira¬
tions 34.
5 a.m.: Temperature 106.6°. Pulse 80. Respira¬
tions 36.
12 a.m.: Same. Breathing tends to Cheyne-Stokes
type. Mucus collects in throat. Pulse
tension low ana volume moderate. Is regular
in time. Bladder not distended. Is pass¬
ing urine involuntarily in bed. Pupils same
as last note. Do not peact to light.
2.30 p.m.: Temperature 107.4 Pulse 118. Respir¬
ations 28.
3 p.m.: Temperature 108.2 Pulse barely felt at
at wrist. Both thumbs strongly adducted
into palms.
3.50 p.m.: Died. Cheyne-Stokes breathing during
last few hours of life.
The post mortem in this case is interesting.
Rigidity marked. Hypostasis slight. Scalp wound
on left side near parietal eminence does not reach
hone. Blood was here extravasated under the scalp
in a thin flake. On reflecting the scalp the line
of fracture was evident. The fracture followed
the lamhdoidal suture along its whole length. The
occiput and parietal hones looking as if prised
apart at the suturnal line. On the right side the
fracture extended into the Sigmoid hend of the lat¬
eral sinus and into the petrous hone. The petrous
hone was split in a tri-radiate manner, starting
from the petro-squamosal suture as a base. One
fracture ran horizontally inwards on the upper sur¬
face of the petrous towards the apex. Another ran
down and inwards to join the fracture into the
lateral sinus. The third fracture was on the anter¬
ior surface of the hone, and ended in the foramen
lacerum medium. On the left side the lateral sinus
escaped and the petrous was fractured for only a
short distance on its anterior surface. There was
a
large haemorrhage over the site of the sigmoid"
curve of the right lateral sinus. Over the Dura
Mater on the right side just under the parietal
eminence there was a thin flake of "blood clot,
somewhat flame-shaped in outline. The pia mater
looked unusually "milky" and opaque on either side
of/
of the vertex. Under dura mater on right side was
a large haemorrhage over the upper part of parietal
lobe, but entirely escaping Rolandic area. The
right frontal lobe was ploughed up by a huge blood
clot as far as the lent^icular nucleus, but the
internal capsule had escaped injury. There was a
smaller haemorrhage in the left frontal lobe. Both
lateral ventricles were free from blood. The
puncta cruenta were gaping and engorged. Brain
tissue generally was very soft and diffluent.
The anterior and middle cranial fossae were
filled with large blood clots. One large one was
lying on the cribriform plate of the ethmoid. On
the right side the clot was compressing the 3rd
nerve on its way to the orbit (vide notes of case).
The left ear was full of blood. On removing the
tegmen tympani it oozed out. Spinal canal and
other areas not affected.
Remarks: Of course this case was unsuitable
for operation. The point of interest in the case is
that the Rolandic areas and the motor tracts were un¬
affected by the blood clots. The 3rd nerve was com¬
pressed later on by blood clots, and this was probab¬
ly the cause of the dilatation of the pupil on the
right side observed about 8 hours after the accident.
The bleeding from the ears was due to the frac¬
tured petrous bones. The Eustachian tubes no doubt
permitted/
permitted of the escape of blood from the ear into
the pharynx and thence into the stomach. This
bleeding must have been profuse at first, for almost
immediately after the accident the deceased vomited
blood.

(/Urr^s/Ls -*> . J%L^ts 't^7^t^t^/ A^r*«-^^ T^»~*i—e- ,
~&aui.AR P\oce^ oF
QcctP' rft >~
firfROO '
reIwP0**1"
^rT/^-^*^-^ <TY ^'VU-ww
C^VL/v-rL-ieHJ

Fracture of Skull. Basal Haemorrhage. Encephalitis.
Pte. Ricketts, 7th Hussars.
Admitted tojGeneral Hospital, Pretoria, on
2nd September with the following history and symptoms:
He was riding his horse down the steep stony side of
a kopje near Pretoria. The horse stumbled and
plunged, pitching the rider off. The man evidently
fell on his head. He was picked up unconscious
shortly afterwards by another trooper who had seen
the accident, and was conveyed to hospital in an
ambulance.
On admission he was quite unconscious, pupils
equal and not dilated or contracted. Reacted
(doubtfully) to light. Bladder distended. Twelve
ounces urine drawn off with a catheter. Over left
parietal eminence was a puffy tumour (?Potts$ which
felt boggy to the touch. One finger breadth anter¬
ior to right parietal eminence was a marked depress¬
ion in the skull.
3rd September: Restless. No paralysis. Pass¬
ed urine and faeces involuntarily in bed. (This con¬
tinued till death). Can be roused fairly easily.
When asked a question he mutters an unintelligible
reply.
9th September: Has taken his food fairly well
during/
during last few days. Temperature 99. Pulse 81.
Can be roused, "but is very lethargic and sleeps all
day. To-day he had.two epileptiform convulsions.
The orderly states that his "face was twitching" the
previous evening, but can give no more definite in¬
formation. On compressing the depressed area of
skull twitching on the right side of face and pec¬
torals and trapezium on the left side occured.
11th September: Pits more frequent. Nine
yesterday, four to-day. Is now quite conscious and
able to answer all questions intelligently. His
replies however, are very slow and his speech is
measured.and staccato in type. On protruding tongue
it deviates to the left side. Left arm paresed. '
Can raise it with difficulty. Grip of left hand
very feeble. Legs not affected.
15th September: Generalised fits more violent
Twitching of left platysma and trapezius then occurs
Had ten fits to-day, nine yesterday.
15th September: Temperature subnormal during
last three days. Pulse 72 per minute.
Sixteen fits to-day. These fits are not localising
at all. He simply lies with his eyes wide open and
twitches occur over left trapezius and right side of
face. Left arm lies paresed, but not absolutely
paralysed. Left leg not affected.
On/
On 15th September I saw the case for the first
time, and the history given above was shown me. The
medical officer in charge of the case recommended
trephining. An X-ray photograph was taken to-day
and the condition of the skull shewn (vide attached
copy). I found the left arm paresed. No signs of
any paralysis elsewhere. Pupils normal. Incon¬
tinence of urine and faeces. Patient dull and
lethargic; when roused protests in a guttural slur¬
ring voice. The depression in the skull previously
noted could not now be felt. As the doctor in
charge of the case was quite sure that the twitching
was practically always present in the left trapezius
and platysma he supported the advisability of trephin¬
ing over the right Rolandic area.
A consultation of four medical officers was now
held and it was deemed advisable to leave the case
alone as the frequently recurring fits and the deep
lethargy - almost coma - of the patient pointed to
an encephalitis. Next morning early the patient
had another fit and died shortly after.
Post Mortem: The skull was fractured as shown
in the skiagram. The fracture followed the coronal
suture along its full length on the right side and
half its length on the left side. Prom this frac¬
ture on the right side two other small fractures
extended backwards on the parietal and temporal
bones. At the extreme end of the right suture the
fracture/
bifurcated, one division ending close to the orbit,
the other running down and back into the temporal
fossa. There was nothing found post mortem to in¬
dicate the depression felt over the right parietal
bone on admission. The parietal bone, however,
was on a higher plane than the frontal, i.e. slight¬
ly overlapping, but both bones were firmly locked
together. On removing calvarium the meningeal
vessels were found to be uninjured.
The brain was felt to be tense and tightly
filling the cranial cavity. On incising the dura
mater disintegrating brain tissue protruded. This
tissue felt soft and diffluent. The cerebral tis¬
sue lying over the right petrous bone had a green¬
ish appearance. Brain tissue apparently healthy
over left side. The lower part of right ascending
parietal convolution looked grey in colour, and felt
soft, friable and disintegrating. Remainder of
Rolandic area appeared healthy.
The 1st right tempero-sphenoidal convolution
was broken up and disintegrated to a very marked
extent. The 2nd broken up also, but not so marked¬
ly as the 1st. This area was really nothing more
than a haemorrhagic debris.
On slicing the brain horizontally a large blood
clot was found lying in the right corpus striatum
and right lateral ventricle. The optic thalamus
was/
was also partly broken up anteriorly. Right in- .
ternal capsule compressed anteriorly, but free
i posteriorly.
Remarks: I take it that the fracture of the
skull had caused severe bruising and contusion of
the brain, and that a subsequent encephalitis devel¬
oped. The haemorrhage at the lower part of the
ascending parietal convolution on the right side may
have been the cause of the twitching of the left
trapezius and the paresis of the left arm. Had the
first and second tempero-sphenoidal convolutions on
the left side been as extensively injured as those
on the right, the man would have had aphasia owing
to the involvement of his centres for the reception
of written and spoken speech. As it was he haS. no
aphasia.
I report this case, as it was under ray care
! during the last 24 hours of life. I did not see it
in its earliest stage. The "X-ray" photograph is
interesting from the way in which it shows the line
of sutural fracture. It also shows the anterior
j
end of the parietal bone lying on a higher plane
than the frontal.

Compound Multiple fracture of Lower Jaw:
Col. Broadley, Army Pay Dept., aet 22.
This man states that while passing along a
lonely lane in Pretoria on the way to barracks late
at night he was suddenly struck from behind with a
Msand-bag". (inter alia, sandbagging was rife in
Pretoria at the conclusion of peace. The "Sandbagger" held a small pillow-shaped bag full of sand
in his hand and, striking his victim on the head
with it. generally succeeded in felling him to the
ground. This was evidently done in this case.)
This corporal then states that he was kicked on the
face and head. The sergeant of the Ambulance who
brought him to hospital told me that the man was
found unconscious in a lane and was carried to
barracks, where he quickly recovered.consciousness.
On the day after the accident (September 16th,
1902) he was admitted to hospital. He was then
conducting himself somewhat erratically, crying one
moment and walking restlessly about the next. He
was not drunk, but was certainly in a state of great
excitement. On talking he grasped his lower jaw
with both hands, unconsciously forming a splint.
The lower jaw was completely fractured through
I
both condyles. These fractures were not compound
as far as one could ascertain. To the right of the
symphisis/
symphisis menti a vertical fracture extended from
the alveolar margin to the lower border of the bone.
This was between the 2nd lateral incisor and the 1st
premolar.tooth. A triangular fragment was caused
by another fracture running from the centre of
this last crack backwards and upwards to the alveola
margin between the 2nd premolar and the 1st molar
tooth. This triangular fragment therefore carried
two teeth on its base.
There was a great deal of swelling round the
jaw, and severe bruising of the tissues. The
injuries certainly appeared to have been caused by
a kick. He had a scalp wound on the right side
of head, but this was only of a trivial nature.
Careful examination was"made for any sign or sympt¬
oms of fracture of the skull, but none were found.
A poroplastic bandage was applied, forming it
into a gutter for the jaw with the two tail pieces
passing up vertically at the angles of the jaw.
The mouth was cleansed at frequent intervals by
passing in the nozzle of a Higginson's syringe be¬
tween the cheek and the jaw and so pumping in
Condy's fluid and lotion containing bicarbonate of
soda.
18th September: Passed a very restless night,
great swelling present under the tongue. Has
great difficulty in speaking and can only swallow
fluids/
fluids. The fragments are in fairly good position,
hut the triangular fragment gives the patient a
great deal of pain.
19th September: Still considerable oedema and
swelling, parts obscured by the great oedema of the
gingival mucous membrane. Still gargling as above.
20th September: Cannot speak at all now. The
swelling has abated considerably from the 18th, but
is still marked. He indicated that the right side
of the jaw is giving him a great deal of pain. He
is restless day and night and constantly requires
sleeping draughts. Saliva dribbles out of the
corners of his mouth and the splint does not seem to
give a great deal of support, although it is well
held up by the usual jaw bandage which is applied
over it. He takes food with increasing difficulty
Temperature (see chart) creeping up. Pulse 102;.per
minute. A fluctuating area can be felt under the
tongue at the root. Evidently a collection of pus
from the site of fracture. I decided therefore to
put the patient under an anaesthetic and explore the
jaw thoroughly, and if necessary wire the fragments.
21st September: Under chloroform.I fully ex¬
plored the jaw and found that the fractures were as
indicated above (The skiagram taken when he was
first admitted to hospital unfortunately is not a
clear one.)
The/
!
i
The fluctuating area under the tongue contained
'
a collection of foul smelling pus. I incised the
mucous membrane over it and swabbed it clean. This
pus came from the fractured edge of the triangular
fragment. The periosteum here was denuded. This
fragment felt very loose, but the periosteum on its
outer surface seemed to be intact. The main body
of the right lower law also moved y'ery freely between
the two fractures, one in front and one at the con¬
dyle.
I therefore wired with stout silver wire the
following fragments, and in the following order.
A. to B., A. to C., and B. to C. There was a great
deal of difficulty in passing the wire through the
holes. The drill used was a bootmaker's bradawl
filed down to the necessary size and shape and it
answered excellently. The fractures at the con¬
dyles were left alone, as with such a septic mouth
it would only have increased the risk of the opera¬
tion to open up the tissue over these simple frac¬
tures. For the purpose of free drainage I made a
counter opening behind the symphisis menti through
the skin and passed a large rubber tube from this
opening just into the mouth cavity. A jaw bandage
was then applied. During the operation .which
lasted an hour, the blood and mucus were a constant
source of trouble. I should have stated that pre¬
paratory/
paratory to commencing the operation I passed a
stout silk ligature through the tip of the tongue and
by this an orderly was able to keep that organ well
out of the way.
22nd September: Kept on nutrient enemata.
Mouth constantly douched freely out with bicarbonate
of soda lotion and weak boracic through a Higginson's
syringe. Temperature down (see chart). Patient
looks very distressed. Given trional to keep him
free from pain. He wrote on his book that hfe was
feeling much better.
12 p.m.: Given grs. xv. chloral and grs.xxv. potass,
bromidi by mouth through a long tube. For thirst
given a saline injection per rectum. Sips of
brandy and water by mouth. Pulse 99.
23rd September: Given by mouth through a tube
Bovril, milk, brandy and beat up egg. Syringing
mouth as before, the tube passing from the floor of
mouth to the chin acts very efficiently. All the
saliva comes out this way on to the dressing over
the lower end of the tube. The swelling has abated
considerably. Patient looks brighter.
28th September: Patient can now take by mouth
"slop" food, such as puddings, soups, scrambled eggs,
tea and coffee. Allowed outside in the sunshine.
Can now douch his own mouth out efficiently. Still
some/
some swelling and oedema, "but it is rapidly going
down. Not allowed to talk yet. Writes that he
has no pain and sleeps well all night without "be¬
ing constantly troubled with saliva and mucus.
Tube removed.
1st Octbber: A loose tooth on the triangular
fragment was removed with the fingers today. It
was so loose that it was considered advisable to
take it away or the patient might accidently aspir¬
ate it into his trachea. Swelling down. Patient
feels well, and is allowed to talk a little. He
can articulate fairly well but has trouble with cert¬
ain letters,such as "n", MeM, &c.
12th October: Fragments united firmly. Wires
all removed.
The after result was uneventful. A very large
callus formed over the site of union of the triangu¬
lar fragment with the body of the jaw. This callus
has caused a quite noticeable prominence on the
right side of the lower jaw, but no doubt the greater
part of this will be absorbed lateroon. This man's
articulation is now quite good. The position of
the jaw is good, and except for the prominence
caused by the callus no bad result has followed from
what was undoubtedly a very severe injury and a very
severe operation.
In reviewing this case I think I made a mistake
in not operating earlier. The triangular fragment
evidently/
evidently required mooring into a firm position from
the first, and the right side of the jaw most cert¬
ainly required wiring in order to get a good result.'
The apparent good position was deceptive, for every
movement of the jaws must have caused a grating of
the fragments and so delayed final union and occa¬
sioned a larger callus at the site of union.
Rigidity is what one strives for in these fractures,
and undoubtedly wiring with silver wire ensures an
absolutely rigid structure.
n
jjArr-cU^ZrV^c^/. Af^f
yV^wwj ■
C^L-izO /^k^O ov^tfty
Aj^f^A^j2^f ^<r^a GOujZ&L&C -fi-r t~^^s ~+o~t>-ue^y
Qtr~£\y-\srtjL0C- x~p~&s^-<^i_^(j /*t<^< qu^Q
t-Z+s ~*+*-lajlj <3^° o^*-js>L
-4-U!-*sJL> Z/xAsCo-fe-^ri/ xy~*^J o-v^fa-x_0i
c
7n«r*JZ0(*-*t' nr»^ao^o
AI£~^ Gsk-uo ^
o--^ ou*r- aAi^C^A. 0~**- ckaa OJ
^rW" ~zu-tsuL
r^ J^rvCy vy
-j*~T CSp^_^o a,
^
fapce^ ^ r<x-j
Fracture Right Side. Lower Jaw. (Wo displacement).
Sapr. Toole, Royal Engineers, while boxing with
a friend in barracks was struck smartly on the right
side of chin and stated that he felt "something give"
He reported to his medical officer who at once sent
him to Hospital.
On admittance one could feel a distinct fracture
on the right side of symphisis menti and passing
almost vertically down between 1st premolar tooth
and lateral incisor. By pressing on either side of
the fracture crepitus was elicited. There was no
displacement whatever. The line of the.lower
margin of the jaw and the level of the crowns of the
teeth were practically perfect.
I simply treated the case by the ordinary tailed
bandage for the jaw. Gave him "slop" food for a
week and a mouth wash of Condy's fluid four or 5
times a day.
In 3 weeks he was put on ordinary hospital
dietary and the bandage was removed. The after
course was uneventful.
The point of interest in the case is the fact
that though the fracture was complete there was no
displacement.

I Simple Fracture of lower end left Fibula.
(Pott's fracture)
Driver J. Barsley. .Royal Horse Artillery.
I
i Act 24. This accident unlike the usual Pott's
I
Fracture was caused by direct violence. This driver
fell off an ammunition waggon while he was galloping
it over a spruit near Pretoria. The wheel of the
waggon passed over his left ankle on the outer side
I
producing the fracture seen in the skiagram.
Crepitus could be elicited and the fingers could be
deeply embedded below the internal malleolus of the
Tibia. The foot was everted and displaced outward
to a very slight degree.
A big pad of wool was placed over the ankle
and an elastic bandage applied over this to reduce
the swelling which was present. The limb was then
fixed on to a back splint with a vertical foot piece
and left untouched for 48 hours. The elastic
bandage was then removed and the other foot kept on
the splint for two weeks,
v\ ?!
A"figure of eight"flannel bandage was then
applied round the ankle and the splint dispensed
with. Passive movements were carried out night
and morning at the ankle joint and the calf muscles
were/
!
I
were massaged after which the bandage was again
applied. In 4 weeks the patient was allowed up on
crutches with his foot in a sling. In six weeks he
was allowed to put his foot to the ground.
Two months after the accident he was discharged
for light duty, to his Battery. The result in this
case was most gratifying. All the movements were
free and easy and when he left Hospital he could
.jump with this leg without feeling any pain or
weakness.
Certainly .even if one had wired or pegged this
fracture (as Mr. Arbuthnot Lane has so successfully
done in many of his simple fractures) a better result
could not have been attained.
Fracture left leg. Comminuted.
Sgt. White, 13th Hussars. Act 45. (See
Skiagram) on attempting to alight from the front
of a mule waggon in motion, the spur of his left
foot was caught on a rope tracing in. front of the
wheel. He fell violently forward on -his faoe and
the moving waggon twisted his leg and dragged him
some distance along the ground. He was a very
heavy fat man and distinctly alcoholic.
About a.n hour after the accident he was admitted
to Hospital under my care. There was then consider¬
able swelling. The foot was displaced backwards
and a.projecting point of bone could be felt under
the skin over the lower third of the Tibia.
Another projecting point could with difficulty be
felt on the peroneal side of the leg in the upper
third. This will be understood from the skiagram
attached. I put the limb on a back splint -
without attempting to remedy the fracture - and then
took an "X" ray photograph. From this the marked
coromunition will be seen.
The Fibula is completely fractured in its upper
third and the upper fragment has been driven down on
to it. The upper fragment has been also somewhat
spirally/
spirally split. The Tibia has evidently been frac¬
tured by a severe twisting force for although there
is very little displacement yet the bone is fragmented.
One point the skiagram does not show and that is
that there was a piece of bone which projected -■■
anteriorly under the skin.
Treatment:- Fourteen lbs. extension applied
and after gently cleaning the limb with 1-80
Carbolic lotion it was placed in a box splint with
Scotch sheeting. Over the places where the project¬
ing points of bone were felt Cyanide gauze and Iodo¬
form powder were applied. The lower end of the bed
was elevated and the box splint laid on a pillow.
Next morning on examining the limb the whole
anterior and lateral aspects were found covered with
huge watery blebs. The man was complaining of
excessive pain. This pain he located to the back of
the leg, in the calf muscles. It was not over the
seats of fracture. After cleansing with weak
Corrosive lotion the blebs were punctured and the
serum pressed, out. The whole limb was then dusted
freely with equal parts of Iodoform and Boric Powder.
The weight extension was increased by 7 lbs (making
21 lbs.) as the projecting piece of bone anteriorly
felt suspiciously close to the skin and appeared as
if it might at any time get through and so making
the case a compound fracture. For the next week
the case went on extremely unsatisfactorily. The
patient loudly complained of the pain in his left
leg and also complained of severe pains at the back
of his right leg. On grasning the muscles of the
right calf he winced and loudly protested. He woke
the other ratients "
at night by his groans and frequent calls for morphia. The man was undoubtedly
an alcoholic and had for years been a heavy drinker.
This accident and the enforced rest has brought on
|
a condition very closely akin to Delirium tremens
and the rains he complained of were, I feel sure, of
the nature of an alcoholic neuritis. He was rest¬
less, refused to take his food, said that we (the
doctor and the orderlies) had a suite against him.
On the 3rd day after the accident therefore,
after a consultation with Major Holt R.A.M.C. the man
was put on the following mixture. .R.Chloral grs.xv
Potass Bromidi grs.xxv
Glycerine 15 minims.
Aq, Anesi ad. half an ounce.
Sig. half ounce t.i.d. p.c.
The condition of the leg at this time gave one no
cause/
cause for anxiety as the position-was excellent, the
blebs had disappeared rapidly and the projecting
point of bone anteriorly could now scarcely be felt.
On the 6th day after the accident the extra 7 lbs.
extension was removed thus leaving 14 lbs. on.
At the same time I spent about half an hour
every evening in attempting gentle massage to the
calf muscles of his leg. (not removing the extension)
This massage was really only of the nature of a
gentle friction to the skin as it would have been
inadvisable to attempt more forcible methods.
On the 12th day after the accident the patient
no longer complained. His restlessness had ceased,
and he was quiet at night. The Bromide was evident¬
ly exerting its therapeutic action. The dose was
therefore diminished and he was given Grs.xx Potassium
Bromide at night and had a mixture containing Iron
and Arsenic in the morning.
Extension weight removed in 3 weeks but limb
still kept on back splint.
The patient now developed a cough of an irrita¬
tive hacking nature and expectorated a fair amount
of/
of mucus. He was therefore propped up in bed and.
piven Ether and Ammonia as an expectorant and stimu- j
i
lant. The fear now of course, was that this heavy -J•
i.
fat alcoholic man might develope Hypostatic
Pneumonia. His temperature had an evening rise of
0 . 0
one degree ranging between 99" and 99'9 F. For¬
tunately all this cleared up in two or 3 days.
On the 4th week the ward sister began to massage
the limb more forcibly. At this time as the posi¬
tion was so good I carried out gentle flexion and
extension inversion and eversion at the ankle and
/ /
slight flexion at the knee joint.
This was still being carried out on the 6th
week when the limb was put up in a Crofts Plaster
Splint and the man got about on crutches.
Ten weeks after the accident the Croft was
removed and the limb bandaged with flannel bandages.
I
The oatient was then made to walk about with a single
stick and to put his foot to the ground. Night
and morning passive movements and massage were
carried out and the bandage reapplied..
The rest of the case was uneventful. Owing to
the physical condition of the man and the great
.
comminution/
comminution of the bones one was disinclined to start
early movements as one would in a Pott's Fracture.
The alcoholic taint made one maintain rigid fixation
to the limb longer than usual as in such cases the
union of the bones is delayed.
(I regret that owing to a break down in the "X"
ray apparatus I was unable to get a 2nd radiogram of
this case when the limb was in good position.)